Mississippi, session 2026, HB1668.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 43-21-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-101.  This chapter shall be cited as the "Youth Court Law." SECTION 2.  Section 43-21-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-103.  This chapter shall be liberally construed to the end that each child coming within the jurisdiction of the youth court shall become a responsible, accountable and productive citizen, and that each such child shall receive such care, guidance and control, preferably in such child's own home as is conducive toward that end and is in the state's and the child's best interest.  It is the public policy of this state that the parents of each child shall be primarily responsible for the care, support, education and welfare of such children; however, when it is necessary that a child be removed from the control of such child's parents, the youth court shall secure proper care for such child. SECTION 3.  Section 43-21-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-105.  The following words and phrases, for purposes of this chapter, shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly otherwise requires: (a)  "Youth court" means the Youth Court Division. (b)  "Judge" means the judge of the Youth Court Division. (c) "Designee" means any person that the judge appoints to perform a duty which this chapter requires to be done by the judge or his designee.  The judge may not appoint a person who is involved in law enforcement or who is an employee of the Mississippi Department of Human Services or the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services to be his designee. (d)  "Child" and "youth" are synonymous, and each means a person who has not reached his eighteenth birthday.  A child who has not reached his eighteenth birthday and is on active duty for a branch of the armed services or is married is not considered a "child" or "youth" for the purposes of this chapter. (e)  "Parent" means the father or mother to whom the child has been born, or the father or mother by whom the child has been legally adopted. (f) "Guardian" means a court-appointed guardian of the person of a child. (g) "Custodian" means any person having the present care or custody of a child whether such person be a parent or otherwise. (h)  "Legal custodian" means a court-appointed custodian of the child. (i)  "Delinquent child" means a child who has reached his tenth birthday and who has committed a delinquent act. (j)  "Delinquent act" is any act, which if committed by an adult, is designated as a crime under state or federal law, or municipal or county ordinance other than offenses punishable by life imprisonment or death.  A delinquent act includes escape from lawful detention and violations of the Uniform Controlled Substances Law and violent behavior. (k)  "Child in need of supervision" means a child who has reached his seventh birthday and is in need of treatment or rehabilitation because the child: (i)  Is habitually disobedient of reasonable and lawful commands of his parent, guardian or custodian and is ungovernable; or (ii)  While being required to attend school, willfully and habitually violates the rules thereof or willfully and habitually absents himself therefrom; or (iii)  Runs away from home without good cause; or (iv)  Has committed a delinquent act or acts. (l)  "Neglected child" means a child: (i)  Whose parent, guardian or custodian or any person responsible for his care or support, neglects or refuses, when able so to do, to provide for him proper and necessary care or support, or education as required by law, or medical, surgical, or other care necessary for his well-being; however, a parent who withholds medical treatment from any child who in good faith is under treatment by spiritual means alone through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious denomination by a duly accredited practitioner thereof shall not, for that reason alone, be considered to be neglectful under any provision of this chapter; or (ii)  Who is otherwise without proper care, custody, supervision or support; or (iii)  Who, for any reason, lacks the special care made necessary for him by reason of his mental condition, whether the mental condition is having mental illness or having an intellectual disability; or (iv)  Who is not provided by the child's parent, guardian or custodian, with food, clothing, or shelter necessary to sustain the life or health of the child, excluding such failure caused primarily by financial inability unless relief services have been offered and refused and the child is in imminent risk of harm. (m)  "Abused child" means a child whose parent, guardian or custodian or any person responsible for his care or support, whether legally obligated to do so or not, has caused or allowed to be caused, upon the child, sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, commercial sexual exploitation, emotional abuse, mental injury, nonaccidental physical injury or other maltreatment.  However, physical discipline, including spanking, performed on a child by a parent, guardian or custodian in a reasonable manner shall not be deemed abuse under this section. "Abused child" also means a child who is or has been trafficked within the meaning of the Mississippi Human Trafficking Act by any person, without regard to the relationship of the person to the child. (n)  "Sexual abuse" means obscene or pornographic photographing, filming or depiction of children for commercial purposes, or the rape, molestation, incest, prostitution or other such forms of sexual exploitation of children under circumstances which indicate that the child's health or welfare is harmed or threatened. (o)  "A child in need of special care" means a child with any mental or physical illness that cannot be treated with the dispositional alternatives ordinarily available to the youth court. (p)  A "dependent child" means any child who is not a child in need of supervision, a delinquent child, an abused child or a neglected child, and which child has been voluntarily placed in the custody of the Department of Child Protection Services by his parent, guardian or custodian. (q) "Custody" means the physical possession of the child by any person. (r)  "Legal custody" means the legal status created by a court order which gives the legal custodian the responsibilities of physical possession of the child and the duty to provide him with food, shelter, education and reasonable medical care, all subject to residual rights and responsibilities of the parent or guardian of the person. (s)  "Detention" means the care of children in physically restrictive facilities. (t) "Shelter" means care of children in physically nonrestrictive facilities. (u)  "Records involving children" means any of the following from which the child can be identified: (i)  All youth court records as defined in Section 43-21-251; (ii)  All forensic interviews conducted by a child advocacy center in abuse and neglect investigations; (iii)  All law enforcement records as defined in Section 43-21-255; (iv)  All agency records as defined in Section 43-21-257; and (v)  All other documents maintained by any representative of the state, county, municipality or other public agency insofar as they relate to the apprehension, custody, adjudication or disposition of a child who is the subject of a youth court cause. (v)  "Any person responsible for care or support" means the person who is providing for the child at a given time.  This term shall include, but is not limited to, stepparents, foster parents, relatives, nonlicensed babysitters or other similar persons responsible for a child and staff of residential care facilities and group homes that are licensed by the Department of Human Services or the Department of Child Protection Services. (w)  The singular includes the plural, the plural the singular and the masculine the feminine when consistent with the intent of this chapter. (x)  "Out-of-home" setting means the temporary supervision or care of children by the staff of licensed day care centers, the staff of public, private and state schools, the staff of juvenile detention facilities, the staff of unlicensed residential care facilities and group homes and the staff of, or individuals representing, churches, civic or social organizations. (y)  "Durable legal custody" means the legal status created by a court order which gives the durable legal custodian the responsibilities of physical possession of the child and the duty to provide him with care, nurture, welfare, food, shelter, education and reasonable medical care.  All these duties as enumerated are subject to the residual rights and responsibilities of the natural parent(s) or guardian(s) of the child or children. (z)  "Status offense" means conduct subject to adjudication by the youth court that would not be a crime if committed by an adult. (aa)  "Financially able" means a parent or child who is ineligible for a court-appointed attorney. (bb) "Assessment" means an individualized examination of a child to determine the child's psychosocial needs and problems, including the type and extent of any mental health, substance abuse or co-occurring mental health and substance abuse disorders and recommendations for treatment.  The term includes, but is not limited to, a drug and alcohol, psychological or psychiatric evaluation, records review, clinical interview or the administration of a formal test and instrument. (cc) "Screening" means a process, with or without the administration of a formal instrument, that is designed to identify a child who is at increased risk of having mental health, substance abuse or co-occurring mental health and substance abuse disorders that warrant immediate attention, intervention or more comprehensive assessment. (dd)  "Durable legal relative guardianship" means the legal status created by a youth court order that conveys the physical and legal custody of a child or children by durable legal guardianship to a relative or fictive kin who is licensed as a foster or resource parent. (ee) "Relative" means a person related to the child by affinity or consanguinity within the third degree. (ff)  "Fictive kin" means a person not related to the child legally or biologically but who is considered a relative due to a significant, familial-like and ongoing relationship with the child and family, including adults related beyond the third degree, godparents, friends of the family, or other adults who have a strong familial bond with the child. (gg)  "Reasonable efforts" means the exercise of reasonable care and due diligence by the Department of Human Services, the Department of Child Protection Services, or any other appropriate entity or person to use services appropriate to the child's background, accessible, and available to meet the individualized needs of the child and child's family to prevent removal and reunify the family as soon as safely possible consistent with the best interests of the child. Reasonable efforts must be made in collaboration with the family and must address the individualized needs of the family that brought the child to the attention of the Department of Child Protection Services and must not consist of required services that are not related to the family's needs. (hh)  "Commercial sexual exploitation" means any sexual act or crime of a sexual nature, which is committed against a child for financial or economic gain, to obtain a thing of value for quid pro quo exchange of property or for any other purpose. SECTION 4.  Section 43-21-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-107.  (1)  A youth court division is hereby created as a division of the county court of each county now or hereafter having a county court, and the county judge shall be the judge of the youth court unless another judge is named by the county judge as provided by this chapter. (2)  A youth court division is hereby created as a division of the chancery court of each county in which no county court is maintained and any chancellor within a chancery court district shall be the judge of the youth court of that county within such chancery court district unless another judge is named by the senior chancellor of the county or chancery court district as provided by this chapter. (3)  In any county where there is no county court or family court on July 1, 1979, there may be created a youth court division as a division of the municipal court in any city if the governing authorities of such city adopt a resolution to that effect.  The cost of the youth court division of the municipal court shall be paid from any funds available to the municipality excluding county funds.  No additional municipal youth court shall be formed after January 1, 2007. SECTION 5.  Section 43-21-109, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-109.  Any county or municipality may separately or jointly establish and maintain detention facilities, shelter facilities, foster homes, or any other facility necessary to carry on the work of the youth court. For said purposes, the county or municipality may acquire necessary land by condemnation, by purchase or donation, may issue bonds as now provided by law for the purpose of purchasing, constructing, remodeling or maintaining such facilities; may expend necessary funds from the general fund to construct and maintain such facilities, and may employ architects to design or remodel such facilities. Such facilities may include a place for housing youth court facilities and personnel. SECTION 6.  Section 43-21-111, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-111.  (1)  In any county not having a county court or family court the judge may appoint as provided in Section 43-21-123 regular or special referees who shall be attorneys at law and members of the bar in good standing to act in cases concerning children within the jurisdiction of the youth court, and a regular referee shall hold office until removed by the judge.  The requirement that regular or special referees appointed pursuant to this subsection be attorneys shall apply only to regular or special referees who were not first appointed regular or special referees prior to July 1, 1991. (2)  Any referee appointed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be required to receive judicial training approved by the Mississippi Judicial College and shall be required to receive regular annual continuing education in the field of juvenile justice.  The amount of judicial training and annual continuing education which shall be satisfactory to fulfill the requirements of this section shall conform with the amount prescribed by the Rules and Regulations for Mandatory Continuing Judicial Education promulgated by the Supreme Court. The Administrative Office of Courts shall maintain a roll of referees appointed under this section, shall enforce the provisions of this subsection and shall maintain records on all such referees regarding such training.  Should a referee miss two (2) consecutive training sessions sponsored or approved by the Mississippi Judicial College as required by this subsection or fail to attend one (1) such training session within six (6) months of their initial appointment as a referee, the referee shall be disqualified to serve and be immediately removed as a referee and another member of the bar shall be appointed as provided in this section. (3)  The judge may direct that hearings in any case or class of cases be conducted in the first instance by the referee.  The judge may also delegate his own administrative responsibilities to the referee. (4)  All hearings authorized to be heard by a referee shall proceed in the same manner as hearings before the youth court judge.  A referee shall possess all powers and perform all the duties of the youth court judge in the hearings authorized to be heard by the referee. (5)  An order entered by the referee shall be mailed immediately to all parties and their counsel.  A rehearing by the judge shall be allowed if any party files a written motion for a rehearing or on the court's own motion within three (3) days after notice of referee's order.  The youth court may enlarge the time for filing a motion for a rehearing for good cause shown.  Any rehearing shall be upon the record of the hearing before the referee, but additional evidence may be admitted in the discretion of the judge.  A motion for a rehearing shall not act as a supersedeas of the referee's order, unless the judge shall so order. (6)  The salary for the referee shall be fixed on order of the judge as provided in Section 43-21-123 and shall be paid by the county out of any available funds budgeted for the youth court by the board of supervisors. (7)  Upon request of the boards of supervisors of two (2) or more counties, the judge of the chancery court may appoint a suitable person as referee to two (2) or more counties within his district, and the payment of salary may be divided in such ratio as may be agreed upon by the boards of supervisors. SECTION 7.  Section 43-21-113, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-113.  When a judge shall certify in writing that he is unable to serve because of illness or absence from the county or district, the judge may appoint as provided in Section 43-21-123 a special judge to serve in his stead.  A special judge shall possess all the powers and perform all the duties of the regular judge.  The compensation for the special judge shall be fixed on order of the judge as provided in Section 43-21-123 on the basis of a statement as to the time and expense incurred by the special judge and shall be paid by the county out of any available funds.  In the case of recusal, a judge shall be selected as provided by law. SECTION 8.  Section 43-21-115, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-115.  In every youth court division the judge shall appoint as provided in Section 43-21-123 one or more persons to function as the intake unit for the youth court division.  The youth court intake unit shall perform all duties specified by this chapter.  If the person serving as the youth court intake unit is not already a salaried public employee, the salary for such person shall be fixed on order of the judge as provided in Section 43-21-123 and shall be paid by the county or municipality, as the case may be, out of any available funds budgeted for the youth court by the board of supervisors. SECTION 9.  Section 43-21-117, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-117.  (1)  The youth court prosecutor shall represent the petitioner in all proceedings in the youth court. (2)  The county prosecuting attorney shall serve as the youth court prosecutor; however, if funds are available pursuant to Section 43-21-123, the court may designate, as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a prosecutor or prosecutors in lieu of or in addition to the county prosecuting attorney.  Where there is a municipal youth court division, the city prosecutor shall serve as youth court prosecutor; provided that the district attorney may participate in transfer proceedings. (3)  The judge may designate as provided in Section 43-21-123 some suitable attorney or attorneys to serve as youth court prosecutor or prosecutors in lieu of or in conjunction with the youth court prosecutor provided in subsection (2) of this section.  The designated youth court prosecutor or prosecutors shall be paid a fee or salary fixed on order of the judge as provided in Section 43-21-123 and shall be paid by the county out of any available funds budgeted for the youth court by the board of supervisors, unless the designated youth court prosecutor or prosecutors serves in a municipal youth court division, in which case he shall be paid a fee or salary fixed on order of the judge from the funds available to the municipality. (4)  All youth court prosecutors and county prosecuting attorneys who serve as youth court prosecutors shall be required to receive juvenile justice training approved by the Mississippi Attorney General's office and regular annual continuing education in the field of juvenile justice.  The Mississippi Attorney General's office shall determine the amount of juvenile justice training and annual continuing education which shall be satisfactory to fulfill the requirements of this subsection.  The Administrative Office of Courts shall maintain a roll of youth court prosecutors, shall enforce the provisions of this subsection and shall maintain records on all such youth court prosecutors regarding such training.  Should a youth court prosecutor miss two (2) consecutive training sessions sponsored by the Mississippi Attorney General's office as required by this subsection or fail to attend one (1) such training session within six (6) months of their designation as youth court prosecutor, the youth court prosecutor shall be disqualified to serve and be immediately removed from the office of youth court prosecutor and another youth court prosecutor shall be designated. SECTION 10.  Section 43-21-119, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-119.  The judge or his designee shall appoint as provided in Section 43-21-123 sufficient personnel, responsible to and under the control of the youth court, to carry on the professional, clerical and other work of the youth court. The cost of these persons appointed by the youth court shall be paid as provided in Section 43-21-123 out of any available funds budgeted for the youth court by the board of supervisors. SECTION 11.  Section 43-21-121, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-121.  (1)  The youth court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the child: (a)  When a child has no parent, guardian or custodian; (b)  When the youth court cannot acquire personal jurisdiction over a parent, a guardian or a custodian; (c)  When the parent is a minor or a person of unsound mind; (d)  When the parent is indifferent to the interest of the child or if the interests of the child and the parent, considered in the context of the cause, appear to conflict; (e)  In every case involving an abused or neglected child which results in a judicial proceeding; or (f)  In any other instance where the youth court finds appointment of a guardian ad litem to be in the best interest of the child. (2)  The guardian ad litem shall be appointed by the court when custody is ordered or at the first judicial hearing regarding the case, whichever occurs first. (3)  In addition to all other duties required by law, a guardian ad litem shall have the duty to protect the interest of a child for whom he has been appointed guardian ad litem.  The guardian ad litem shall investigate, make recommendations to the court or enter reports as necessary to hold paramount the child's best interest.  The guardian ad litem is not an adversary party and the court shall ensure that guardians ad litem perform their duties properly and in the best interest of their wards.  The guardian ad litem shall be a competent person who has no adverse interest to the minor.  The court shall ensure that the guardian ad litem is adequately instructed on the proper performance of his duties. (4)  The court, including a county court serving as a youth court, may appoint either a suitable attorney or a suitable layman as guardian ad litem.  In cases where the court appoints a layman as guardian ad litem, the court shall also appoint an attorney to represent the child.  From and after January 1, 1999, in order to be eligible for an appointment as a guardian ad litem, such attorney or layperson must have received child protection and juvenile justice training provided by or approved by the Mississippi Judicial College within the year immediately preceding such appointment.  The Mississippi Judicial College shall determine the amount of child protection and juvenile justice training which shall be satisfactory to fulfill the requirements of this section.  The Administrative Office of Courts shall maintain a roll of all attorneys and laymen eligible to be appointed as a guardian ad litem under this section and shall enforce the provisions of this subsection. (5)  Upon appointment of a guardian ad litem, the youth court shall continue any pending proceedings for a reasonable time to allow the guardian ad litem to familiarize himself with the matter, consult with counsel and prepare his participation in the cause.  The youth court shall issue an order of assignment that grants the guardian ad litem authority to review all relevant documents concerning the minor child and to interview all parties and witnesses involved in proceedings concerning the minor child for whom the guardian ad litem is appointed. (6)  Upon order of the youth court, the guardian ad litem shall be paid a reasonable fee as determined by the youth court judge or referee out of the county general fund as provided under Section 43-21-123.  To be eligible for such fee, the guardian ad litem shall submit an accounting of the time spent in performance of his duties to the court. (7)  (a)  The court, in its sound discretion, may appoint a volunteer trained layperson to assist children subject to the provisions of this section in addition to the appointment of a guardian ad litem.  If the court utilizes his or her discretion as prescribed under this subsection, a volunteer Court-Appointed Special Advocate (CASA) shall be appointed from a program that supervises the volunteer and meets all state and national CASA standards to advocate for the best interests of children in abuse and neglect proceedings.  To accomplish the assignment of a CASA volunteer, the court shall issue an order of assignment that shall grant the CASA volunteer the authority, equal to that of the guardian ad litem, to review all relevant documents and to interview all parties and witnesses involved in the proceeding in which he or she is appointed.  Except as otherwise ordered by the court, the assignment of a CASA volunteer for a child shall include subsequent proceedings through permanent placement of the child. (b)  Before assigning a CASA volunteer as prescribed under this subsection, the youth court judge shall determine if the volunteer has sufficient qualifications, training and ability to serve as a CASA volunteer, including his or her ability to represent and advocate for the best interests of children assigned to him or her.  No volunteer shall be assigned until a comprehensive criminal background check has been conducted. All CASA volunteers shall: (i)  Be sworn in by a judge of the court; (ii)  Swear or affirm to abide by all laws, regulations, and orders of the court; (iii)  Swear or affirm to advocate what he or she perceives to be in the best interests of the child for whom he or she is assigned in all matters pending before the court; (iv)  Provide independent, factual information to the court regarding the children and cases to which they are assigned; (v)  Advocate on behalf of the children involved in the cases to which they are assigned what they perceive to be in the best interests of the children; and (vi)  Monitor proceedings in cases to which they have been assigned and advise and assist the court in its determination of the best interests of the children involved. (c)  Regarding any case to which a CASA volunteer has been assigned, the CASA volunteer: (i)  Shall be notified by the court of all court proceedings and hearings of any kind pertaining to the child; (ii)  Shall be notified by the Department of Child Protection Services of all administrative review hearings; (iii)  Shall be entitled to attend all court proceedings and hearings of any kind pertaining to the child; (iv)  May be called as a witness in the proceedings by any party or by the court and may request of the court the opportunity to appear as a witness; and (v)  Shall be given access to all portions of the court record relating to proceedings pertaining to the child and the child's family. (d)  Upon application to the court and notice to all parties, the court shall grant the CASA volunteer access to other information, including the department records as provided in Section 43-21-261, relating to the child and the child's family and to other matters involved in the proceeding in which he or she is appointed. All records and information requested or reviewed by the CASA volunteer in the course of his or her assignment shall be deemed confidential and shall not be disclosed by him except pursuant to court order.  All records and information shall only be disclosed as directed by court order and shall be disclosed as directed by court order and shall be subject to whatever protective order the court deems appropriate. SECTION 12.  Section 43-21-123, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-123.  Except for expenses provided by state funds and/or other monies, the board of supervisors, or the municipal governing board where there is a municipal youth court, shall adequately provide funds for the operation of the youth court division of the chancery court in conjunction with the regular chancery court budget, or the county or family courts where said courts are constituted.  In preparation for said funding, on an annual basis at the time requested, the youth court judge or administrator shall prepare and submit to the board of supervisors, or the municipal governing board of the youth court wherever the youth court is a municipal court, an annual budget which will identify the number, staff position, title and amount of annual or monthly compensation of each position as well as provide for other expenditures necessary to the functioning and operation of the youth court.  When the budget of the youth court or youth court judge is approved by the board of supervisors or the governing authority of the municipality, then the youth court or youth court judge may employ such persons as provided in the budget from time to time. The board of supervisors of any county in which there is located a youth court, and the governing authority of any municipality in which there is located a municipal youth court, are each authorized to reimburse the youth court judges and other youth court employees or personnel for reasonable travel and expenses incurred in the performance of their duties and in attending educational meetings offering professional training to such persons as budgeted. SECTION 13.  Section 43-21-125, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-125.  (1)  There shall be a Mississippi Council of Youth Court Judges which shall be the official organization of the judges having youth court jurisdiction in this state. The membership of the council shall consist of all the judges and referees of youth courts in the State of Mississippi. (2)  The Mississippi Council of Youth Court Judges is authorized to adopt and, from time to time, amend such rules, regulations or bylaws as it considers necessary to the conduct of its affairs. (3)  The council may elect officers and provide for such meetings of the council as it deems necessary. The council shall meet at least annually for the consideration of: (a)  Any and all matters pertaining to the discharge of the official duties and obligations of its members; and (b)  Problems that have arisen in connection with the operation of the youth courts in any county or in all counties in order to improve the administration of juvenile justice in the state. (4)  The council shall publish and submit to the Governor, the chief justice of the Supreme Court, and the Mississippi Judicial Council an annual report of the operations which shall include financial and statistical data and may include suggestions and recommendations for legislation. (5)  The council is authorized to receive and expend any funds which may become available from the federal government to carry out any of the purposes of this chapter, and to this end the council may meet any federal requirements not contrary to state law which may be conditions precedent to receiving such federal funds. (6)  The council may cooperate with the federal government in a program for training personnel employed or preparing for employment by the youth court and may receive and expend funds from federal or state sources or from private donations for such purposes. The council may contract with public or nonprofit institutions of higher learning for the training of such personnel, may conduct short-term training courses of its own, may hire experts on a temporary basis for such purpose and may cooperate with the department of youth services or other state departments or agencies in personnel training programs. SECTION 14.  Section 43-21-127, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-127.  It is hereby made the duty of every public official or department to render all assistance and cooperation within his or its jurisdictional power which may further the objects of this chapter. The youth court is authorized to seek the cooperation of all societies, organizations or agencies having for their object the protection or aid of children. SECTION 15.  Section 43-21-151, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-151.  (1)  The youth court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction in all proceedings concerning a delinquent child, a child in need of supervision, a neglected child, an abused child or a dependent child except in the following circumstances: (a)  Any act attempted or committed by a child, which if committed by an adult would be punishable under state or federal law by life imprisonment or death, will be in the original jurisdiction of the circuit court; (b)  Any act attempted or committed by a child with the use of a deadly weapon, the carrying of which concealed is prohibited by Section 97-37-1, or a shotgun or a rifle, which would be a felony if committed by an adult, will be in the original jurisdiction of the circuit court; and (c)  When a charge of abuse or neglect of a child first arises in the course of a custody action between the parents of the child already pending in the chancery court and no notice of such abuse was provided prior to such chancery proceedings, the chancery court may proceed with the investigation, hearing and determination of such abuse or neglect charge as a part of its hearing and determination of the custody issue as between the parents, notwithstanding the other provisions of the Youth Court Law.  The proceedings in chancery court on the abuse or neglect charge shall be confidential in the same manner as provided in youth court proceedings. When a child is expelled from the public schools, the youth court shall be notified of the act of expulsion and the act or acts constituting the basis for expulsion. (2)  Jurisdiction of the child in the cause shall attach at the time of the offense, or at the time of the allegation of abuse, neglect or exploitation, and shall continue thereafter for that offense or the allegations of abuse, neglect or exploitation until the child's twentieth birthday, unless sooner terminated by order of the youth court.  The youth court shall not have jurisdiction over offenses committed by a child on or after his eighteenth birthday, nor have jurisdiction of abuse, neglect, or exploitation committed against a child after their eighteenth birthday. (3)  No child who has not reached his thirteenth birthday shall be held criminally responsible or criminally prosecuted for a misdemeanor or felony; however, the parent, guardian or custodian of such child may be civilly liable for any criminal acts of such child.  No child under the jurisdiction of the youth court shall be held criminally responsible or criminally prosecuted by any court for any act designated as a delinquent act, unless jurisdiction is transferred to another court under Section 43-21-157. (4)  The youth court shall also have jurisdiction of offenses committed by a child which have been transferred to the youth court by an order of a circuit court of this state having original jurisdiction of the offense, as provided by Section 43-21-159. (5)  The youth court shall regulate and approve the use of teen court as provided in Section 43-21-753. (6)  Nothing in this section shall prevent the circuit court from assuming jurisdiction over a youth who has committed an act of delinquency upon a youth court's ruling that a transfer is appropriate pursuant to Section 43-21-157. SECTION 16.  Section 43-21-153, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-153.  (1)  The youth court shall have full power and authority to issue all writs and processes including injunctions necessary to the exercise of jurisdiction and to carrying out the purpose of this chapter. (2)  Any person who willfully violates, neglects or refuses to obey, perform or comply with any order of the youth court shall be in contempt of court and punished by a fine not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment in jail not to exceed ninety (90) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment. SECTION 17.  Section 43-21-155, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-155.  (1)  If a child is alleged to be a delinquent child or a child in need of supervision, the proceedings shall be commenced in any county where any of the alleged acts are said to have occurred.  After adjudication, the youth court may, in the best interest of the child, transfer the case at any stage of the proceeding for disposition to the county where the child resides or to a county where a youth court has previously acquired jurisdiction. (2)  If a child is alleged to be an abused or neglected child, the proceedings shall be commenced in the county where the child's custodian resides or in the county where the child is present when the report is made to the intake unit.  After adjudication the youth court may transfer the case at any stage of the proceeding for disposition to the county where the child resides or to a county where a youth court has previously acquired jurisdiction if that is in the best interest of the child. SECTION 18.  Section 43-21-157, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-157.  (1)  If a child who has reached his thirteenth birthday is charged by petition to be a delinquent child, the youth court, either on motion of the youth court prosecutor or on the youth court's own motion, after a hearing as hereinafter provided, may, in its discretion, transfer jurisdiction of the alleged offense described in the petition or a lesser included offense to the criminal court which would have trial jurisdiction of such offense if committed by an adult. The child shall be represented by counsel in transfer proceedings. (2)  A motion to transfer shall be filed on a day prior to the date set for the adjudicatory hearing but not more than ten (10) days after the filing of the petition.  The youth court may order a transfer study at any time after the motion to transfer is filed.  The transfer study and any other social record which the youth court will consider at the transfer hearing shall be made available to the child's counsel prior to the hearing.  Summons shall be served in the same manner as other summons under this chapter with a copy of the motion to transfer and the petition attached thereto. (3)  The transfer hearing shall be bifurcated.  At the transfer hearing, the youth court shall first determine whether probable cause exists to believe that the child committed the alleged offense.  For the purpose of the transfer hearing only, the child may, with the assistance of counsel, waive the determination of probable cause. (4)  Upon such a finding of probable cause, the youth court may transfer jurisdiction of the alleged offense and the youth if the youth court finds by clear and convincing evidence that there are no reasonable prospects of rehabilitation within the juvenile justice system. (5)  The factors which shall be considered by the youth court in determining the reasonable prospects of rehabilitation within the juvenile justice system are: (a)  Whether or not the alleged offense constituted a substantial danger to the public; (b)  The seriousness of the alleged offense; (c)  Whether or not the transfer is required to protect the community; (d)  Whether or not the alleged offense was committed in an aggressive, violent, premeditated or willful manner; (e)  Whether the alleged offense was against persons or against property, greater weight being given to the offense against persons, especially if personal injury resulted; (f)  The sophistication, maturity and educational background of the child; (g)  The child's home situation, emotional condition and lifestyle; (h)  The history of the child, including experience with the juvenile justice system, other courts, probation, commitments to juvenile institutions or other placements; (i)  Whether or not the child can be retained in the juvenile justice system long enough for effective treatment or rehabilitation; (j)  The dispositional resources available to the juvenile justice system; (k)  Dispositional resources available to the adult correctional system for the child if treated as an adult; (l)  Whether the alleged offense was committed on school property, public or private, or at any school-sponsored event, and constituted a substantial danger to other students; (m)  Any other factors deemed relevant by the youth court; and (n)  Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the transfer of jurisdiction of an alleged offense and a child if that child, at the time of the transfer hearing, previously has not been placed in a juvenile institution. (6)  If the youth court transfers jurisdiction of the alleged offense to a criminal court, the youth court shall enter a transfer order containing: (a)  Facts showing that the youth court had jurisdiction of the cause and of the parties; (b)  Facts showing that the child was represented by counsel; (c)  Facts showing that the hearing was held in the presence of the child and his counsel; (d)  A recital of the findings of probable cause and the facts and reasons underlying the youth court's decision to transfer jurisdiction of the alleged offense; (e)  The conditions of custody or release of the child pending criminal court proceedings, including bail or recognizance as the case may justify, as well as a designation of the custodian for the time being; and (f)  A designation of the alleged offense transferred and of the court to which the transfer is made and a direction to the clerk to forward for filing in such court a certified copy of the transfer order of the youth court. (7)  The testimony of the child respondent at a transfer hearing conducted pursuant to this chapter shall not be admissible against the child in any proceeding other than the transfer hearing. (8)  When jurisdiction of an offense is transferred to the circuit court, or when a youth has committed an act which is in original circuit court jurisdiction pursuant to Section 43-21-151, the jurisdiction of the youth court over the youth for any future offenses is terminated, except that jurisdiction over future offenses is not terminated if the circuit court transfers or remands the transferred case to the youth court or if a child who has been transferred to the circuit court or is in the original jurisdiction of the circuit court is not convicted.  However, when jurisdiction of an offense is transferred to the circuit court pursuant to this section or when an offense committed by a youth is in original circuit court jurisdiction pursuant to Section 43-21-151, the circuit court shall thereafter assume and retain jurisdiction of any felony offenses committed by such youth without any additional transfer proceedings.  Any misdemeanor offenses committed by youth who are in circuit court jurisdiction pursuant to this section or Section 43-21-151 shall be prosecuted in the court which would have jurisdiction over that offense if committed by an adult without any additional transfer proceedings.  The circuit court may review the transfer proceedings on motion of the transferred child.  Such review shall be on the record of the hearing in the youth court.  The circuit court shall remand the offense to the youth court if there is no substantial evidence to support the order of the youth court.  The circuit court may also review the conditions of custody or release pending criminal court proceedings. (9)  When any youth has been the subject of a transfer to circuit court for an offense committed in any county of the state or has committed any act which is in the original jurisdiction of the circuit court pursuant to Section 43-21-151, that transfer or original jurisdiction shall be recognized by all other courts of the state and no subsequent offense committed by such youth in any county of the state shall be in the jurisdiction of the youth court unless transferred to the youth court pursuant to Section 43-21-159(3).  Transfers from youth courts of other states shall be recognized by the courts of this state and no youth who has a pending charge or a conviction in the adult court system of any other state shall be in the jurisdiction of the youth courts of this state, but such youths shall be in the jurisdiction of the circuit court for any felony committed in this state or in the jurisdiction of the court of competent jurisdiction for any misdemeanor committed in this state. SECTION 19.  Section 43-21-159, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-159.  (1)  When a person appears before a court other than the youth court, and it is determined that the person is a child under jurisdiction of the youth court, such court shall, unless the jurisdiction of the offense has been transferred to such court as provided in this chapter, or unless the child has previously been the subject of a transfer from the youth court to the circuit court for trial as an adult and was convicted, immediately dismiss the proceeding without prejudice and forward all documents pertaining to the cause to the youth court; and all entries in permanent records shall be expunged.  The youth court shall have the power to order and supervise the expunction or the destruction of such records in accordance with Section 43-21-265.  Upon petition therefor, the youth court shall expunge the record of any case within its jurisdiction in which an arrest was made, the person arrested was released and the case was dismissed or the charges were dropped, there was no disposition of such case, or the person was found not delinquent. In cases where the child is charged with a hunting or fishing violation or a traffic violation, whether it be any state or federal law, a violation of the Mississippi Implied Consent Law, or municipal ordinance or county resolution, or where the child is charged with a violation of Section 67-3-70, the appropriate criminal court shall proceed to dispose of the same in the same manner as for other adult offenders and it shall not be necessary to transfer the case to the youth court of the county.  However, unless the cause has been transferred, or unless the child has previously been the subject of a transfer from the youth court to the circuit court for trial as an adult and was convicted, the youth court shall have power on its own motion to remove jurisdiction from any criminal court of any offense including a hunting or fishing violation, a traffic violation, a violation of the Mississippi Implied Consent Law, or a violation of Section 67-3-70, committed by a child in a matter under the jurisdiction of the youth court and proceed therewith in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. (2)  After conviction and sentence of any child by any other court having original jurisdiction on a misdemeanor charge, and within the time allowed for an appeal of such conviction and sentence, the youth court of the county shall have the full power to stay the execution of the sentence and to release the child on good behavior or on other order as the youth court may see fit to make unless the child has previously been the subject of a transfer from the youth court to the circuit court for trial as an adult and was convicted.  When a child is convicted of a misdemeanor and is committed to, incarcerated in or imprisoned in a jail or other place of detention by a criminal court having proper jurisdiction of such charge, such court shall notify the youth court judge or the judge's designee of the conviction and sentence prior to the commencement of such incarceration.  The youth court shall have the power to order and supervise the destruction of any records involving children maintained by the criminal court in accordance with Section 43-21-265.  However, the youth court shall have the power to set aside a judgment of any other court rendered in any matter over which the youth court has exclusive original jurisdiction, to expunge or destroy the records thereof in accordance with Section 43-21-265, and to order a refund of fines and costs. (3)  Nothing in subsection (1) or (2) shall apply to a youth who has a pending charge or a conviction for any crime over which circuit court has original jurisdiction. (4)  In any case wherein the defendant is a child as defined in this chapter and of which the circuit court has original jurisdiction, the circuit judge, upon a finding that it would be in the best interest of such child and in the interest of justice, may at any stage of the proceedings prior to the attachment of jeopardy transfer such proceedings to the youth court for further proceedings unless the child has previously been the subject of a transfer from the youth court to the circuit court for trial as an adult and was convicted or has previously been convicted of a crime which was in original circuit court jurisdiction, and the youth court shall, upon acquiring jurisdiction, proceed as provided in this chapter for the adjudication and disposition of delinquent child proceeding proceedings.  If the case is not transferred to the youth court and the youth is convicted of a crime by any circuit court, the trial judge shall sentence the youth as though such youth was an adult.  The circuit court shall not have the authority to commit such child to the custody of the Department of Youth Services for placement in a state-supported training school. (5)  In no event shall a court sentence an offender over the age of eighteen (18) to the custody of the Division of Youth Services for placement in a state-supported training school. (6)  When a child's driver's license is suspended by the youth court for any reason, the clerk of the youth court shall report the suspension, without a court order under Section 43-21-261, to the Commissioner of Public Safety in the same manner as such suspensions are reported in cases involving adults. (7)  No offense involving the use or possession of a firearm by a child who has reached his fifteenth birthday and which, if committed by an adult would be a felony, shall be transferred to the youth court. SECTION 20.  Section 43-21-205, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-205.  In proceedings under this chapter, no court costs shall be charged against any party to a petition, and no salaried officer of the state, county or any municipality, nor any youth court counselor, nor any witness other than an expert witness shall be entitled to receive any fee for any service rendered to the youth court or for attendance in the youth court in any proceedings under this chapter; but the fees of the circuit and chancery clerks in youth court cases originating by petition or any other youth court matter acted upon by the court shall be paid as is provided by law for like services in other cases and shall be paid by the county on allowance of the board of supervisors on an itemized cost bill approved by the judge.  These costs shall be paid out of the general fund. SECTION 21.  Section 43-21-261, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-21-261.  (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, records involving children shall not be disclosed, other than to necessary staff or officials of the youth court, a guardian ad litem appointed to a child by the court, or a Court-Appointed Special Advocate (CASA) volunteer who may be assigned in a dependency, abuse or neglect case, except pursuant to an order of the youth court specifying the person or persons to whom the records may be disclosed, the extent of the records which may be disclosed and the purpose of the disclosure.  Such court orders for disclosure shall be limited to those instances in which the youth court concludes, in its discretion, that disclosure is required for the best interests of the child, the public safety, the functioning of the youth court, or to identify a person who knowingly made a false allegation of child abuse or neglect, and then only to the following persons: (a)  The judge of another youth court or member of another youth court staff; (b)  The court of the parties in a child custody or adoption cause in another court; (c)  A judge of any other court or members of another court staff, including the chancery court that ordered a forensic interview; (d)  Representatives of a public or private agency providing supervision or having custody of the child under order of the youth court; (e)  Any person engaged in a bona fide research purpose, provided that no information identifying the subject of the records shall be made available to the researcher unless it is absolutely essential to the research purpose and the judge gives prior written approval, and the child, through his or her representative, gives permission to release the information; (f)  The Mississippi Department of Employment Security, or its duly authorized representatives, for the purpose of a child's enrollment into the Job Corps Training Program as authorized by Title IV of the Comprehensive Employment Training Act of 1973 (29 USCS Section 923 et seq.).  However, no records, reports, investigations or information derived therefrom pertaining to child abuse or neglect shall be disclosed; (g)  Any person pursuant to a finding by a judge of the youth court of compelling circumstances affecting the health, safety or well-being of a child and that such disclosure is in the best interests of the child or an adult who was formerly the subject of a youth court delinquency proceeding; (h)  A person who was the subject of a knowingly made false allegation of child abuse or neglect which has resulted in a conviction of a perpetrator in accordance with Section 97-35-47 or which allegation was referred by the Department of Child Protection Services to a prosecutor or law enforcement official in accordance with the provisions of Section 43-21-353(4). Law enforcement agencies may disclose information to the public concerning the taking of a child into custody for the commission of a delinquent act without the necessity of an order from the youth court.  The information released shall not identify the child or his address unless the information involves a child convicted as an adult. (2)  Any records involving children which are disclosed under an order of the youth court or pursuant to the terms of this section and the contents thereof shall be kept confidential by the person or agency to whom the record is disclosed unless otherwise provided in the order.  Any further disclosure of any records involving children shall be made only under an order of the youth court as provided in this section. (3)  Upon request, the parent, guardian or custodian of the child who is the subject of a youth court cause or any attorney for such parent, guardian or custodian, shall have the right to inspect any record, report or investigation relevant to a matter to be heard by a youth court, except that the identity of the reporter shall not be released, nor the name of any other person where the person or agency making the information available finds that disclosure of the information would be likely to endanger the life or safety of such person.  The attorney for the parent, guardian or custodian of the child, upon request, shall be provided a copy of any record, report or investigation relevant to a matter to be heard by a youth court, but the identity of the reporter must be redacted and the name of any other person must also be redacted if the person or agency making the information available finds that disclosure of the information would be likely to endanger the life, safety or well-being of the person.  A record provided to the attorney under this section must remain in the attorney's control and the attorney may not provide copies or access to another person or entity without prior consent of a court with appropriate jurisdiction. (4)  Upon request, the child who is the subject of a youth court cause shall have the right to have his counsel inspect and copy any record, report or investigation which is filed with the youth court or which is to be considered by the youth court at a hearing. (5)  (a)  The youth court prosecutor or prosecutors, the county attorney, the district attorney, the youth court defender or defenders, or any attorney representing a child shall have the right to inspect and copy any law enforcement record involving children. (b)  The Department of Child Protection Services shall disclose to a county prosecuting attorney or district attorney any and all records resulting from an investigation into suspected child abuse or neglect when the case has been referred by the Department of Child Protection Services to the county prosecuting attorney or district attorney for criminal prosecution. (c)  Agency records made confidential under the provisions of this section may be disclosed to a court of competent jurisdiction. (d)  Records involving children shall be disclosed to the Division of Victim Compensation of the Office of the Attorney General upon the division's request without order of the youth court for purposes of determination of eligibility for victim compensation benefits. (6)  Information concerning an investigation into a report of child abuse or child neglect may be disclosed by the Department of Child Protection Services without order of the youth court to any attorney, physician, dentist, intern, resident, nurse, psychologist, social worker, family protection worker, family protection specialist, child caregiver, minister, law enforcement officer, or a public or private school employee making that report pursuant to Section 43-21-353(1) if the reporter has a continuing professional relationship with the child and a need for such information in order to protect or treat the child. (7)  Information concerning an investigation into a report of child abuse or child neglect may be disclosed without further order of the youth court to any interagency child abuse task force established in any county or municipality by order of the youth court of that county or municipality. (8)  Names and addresses of juveniles twice adjudicated as delinquent for an act which would be a felony if committed by an adult or for the unlawful possession of a firearm shall not be held confidential and shall be made available to the public. (9)  Names and addresses of juveniles adjudicated as delinquent for murder, manslaughter, burglary, arson, armed robbery, aggravated assault, any sex offense as defined in Section 45-33-23, for any violation of Section 41-29-139(a)(1) or for any violation of Section 63-11-30, shall not be held confidential and shall be made available to the public. (10)  The judges of the circuit and county courts, and presentence investigators for the circuit courts, as provided in Section 47-7-9, shall have the right to inspect any youth court records of a person convicted of a crime for sentencing purposes only. (11)  The victim of an offense committed by a child who is the subject of a youth court cause shall have the right to be informed of the child's disposition by the youth court. (12)  A classification hearing officer of the State Department of Corrections, as provided in Section 47-5-103, shall have the right to inspect any youth court records, excluding abuse and neglect records, of any offender in the custody of the department who as a child or minor was a juvenile offender or was the subject of a youth court cause of action, and the State Parole Board, as provided in Section 47-7-17, shall have the right to inspect such records when the offender becomes eligible for parole. (13)  The youth court shall notify the Department of Public Safety of the name, and any other identifying information such department may require, of any child who is adjudicated delinquent as a result of a violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Law. (14)  The Administrative Office of Courts shall have the right to inspect any youth court records in order that the number of youthful offenders, abused, neglected, truant and dependent children, as well as children in need of special care and children in need of supervision, may be tracked with specificity through the youth court and adult justice system, and to utilize tracking forms for such purpose. (15)  Upon a request by a youth court, the Administrative Office of Courts shall disclose all information at its disposal concerning any previous youth court intakes alleging that a child was a delinquent child, child in need of supervision, child in need of special care, truant child, abused child or neglected child, as well as any previous youth court adjudications for the same and all dispositional information concerning a child who at the time of such request comes under the jurisdiction of the youth court making such request. (16)  The Administrative Office of Courts * * * may, in its discretion, shall disclose to the Department of Public Safety and the Department of Human Services any or all of the information involving children contained in the office's youth court data management system known as Mississippi Youth Court Information Delivery System or "MYCIDS." (17)  The youth courts of the state shall disclose to the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) any youth court records in order that the number of youthful offenders, abused, neglected, truant and dependent children, as well as children in need of special care and children in need of supervision, may be tracked with specificity through the youth court and adult justice system, and to utilize tracking forms for such purpose.  The disclosure prescribed in this subsection shall not require a court order and shall be made in sortable, electronic format where possible.  The PEER Committee may seek the assistance of the Administrative Office of Courts in seeking this information. The PEER Committee shall not disclose the identities of any youth who have been adjudicated in the youth courts of the state and shall only use the disclosed information for the purpose of monitoring the effectiveness and efficiency of programs established to assist adjudicated youth, and to ascertain the incidence of adjudicated youth who become adult offenders. (18)  In every case where an abuse or neglect allegation has been made, the confidentiality provisions of this section shall not apply to prohibit access to a child's records by any state regulatory agency, any state or local prosecutorial agency or law enforcement agency; however, no identifying information concerning the child in question may be released to the public by such agency except as otherwise provided herein. (19)  In every case of child abuse or neglect, if a child's physical condition is medically labeled as medically "serious" or "critical" or a child dies, the confidentiality provisions of this section shall not apply.  In such cases, the following information may be released by the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services:  the cause of the circumstances regarding the fatality or medically serious or critical physical condition; the age and gender of the child; information describing any previous reports of child abuse or neglect investigations that are pertinent to the child abuse or neglect that led to the fatality or medically serious or critical physical condition; the result of any such investigations; and the services provided by and actions of the state on behalf of the child that are pertinent to the child abuse or neglect that led to the fatality or medically serious or critical physical condition. (20)  Any member of a foster care review board designated by the Department of Child Protection Services shall have the right to inspect youth court records relating to the abuse, neglect or child in need of supervision cases assigned to such member for review. (21)  Information concerning an investigation into a report of child abuse or child neglect may be disclosed without further order of the youth court in any administrative or due process hearing held, pursuant to Section 43-21-257, by the Department of Child Protection Services for individuals whose names will be placed on the central registry as substantiated perpetrators. (22)  The Department of Child Protection Services may disclose records involving children to the following: (a)  A foster home, residential child-caring agency or child-placing agency to the extent necessary to provide such care and services to a child; (b)  An individual, agency or organization that provides services to a child or the child's family in furtherance of the child's permanency plan to the extent necessary in providing those services; (c)  Health and mental health care providers of a child to the extent necessary for the provider to properly treat and care for the child; (d)  An educational institution or educational services provider where the child is enrolled or where enrollment is anticipated to the extent necessary for the school to provide appropriate services to the child; (e)  Any state agency or board that administers student financial assistance programs.  However, any records request under this paragraph shall be initiated by the agency or board for the purpose determining the child's eligibility for student financial assistance, and any disclosure shall be limited to the verification of the child's age during the period of time in which the child was in the department's legal custody; and (f)  Any other state agency if the disclosure is necessary to the department in fulfilling its statutory responsibilities in protecting the best interests of the child. (23)  Nothing in this section or chapter shall require youth court approval for disclosure of records involving children as defined in Section 43-21-105(u), if the disclosure is made in a criminal matter by a municipal or county prosecutor, a district attorney or statewide prosecutor, pursuant to the Mississippi Rules of Criminal Procedure and the records are disclosed under a protective order issued by the Circuit Court presiding over the criminal matter which incorporates the penalties stated in Section 43-21-267. (24)  The provisions of this section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2026. SECTION 22.  Section 43-21-351, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-351.  (1)  Any person or agency having knowledge that a child residing or being within the county is within the jurisdiction of the youth court may make a written report to the intake unit alleging facts sufficient to establish the jurisdiction of the youth court.  The report shall bear a permanent number that will be assigned by the court in accordance with the standards established by the Administrative Office of Courts pursuant to Section 9-21-9(d), and shall be preserved until destroyed on order of the court. (2)  There shall be in each youth court of the state an intake officer who shall be responsible for the accurate and timely entering of all intake and case information into the Mississippi Youth Court Information Delivery System (MYCIDS) for the Department of Human Services - Division of Youth Services, truancy matters, and the Department of Child Protection Services.  It shall be the responsibility of the youth court judge or referee of each county to ensure that the intake officer is carrying out the responsibility of this section. (3)  Each intake officer shall receive, at a minimum, six (6) hours of annual training on MYCIDS provided by the Mississippi Judicial College.  The required training under this subsection shall be in addition to technical training provided by the Mississippi Supreme Court MYCIDS Information Technology Department. (4)  The Mississippi Judicial College, in conjunction with the Administrative Office of Courts, shall develop training materials on MYCIDS: (a)  To ensure the accurate and timely entrance of all intake and case information throughout the state by intake officers; (b)  To ensure that youth court judges are equipped to oversee the functions of each intake officer. (5)  The provisions of this section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2026. SECTION 23.  Section 43-21-353, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-353.  (1)  Any attorney, physician, dentist, intern, resident, nurse, psychologist, social worker, family protection worker, family protection specialist, child caregiver, minister, law enforcement officer, public or private school employee or any other person having reasonable cause to suspect that a child is a neglected child, an abused child, or a victim of commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking shall cause an oral report to be made immediately by telephone or otherwise and followed as soon thereafter as possible by a report in writing to the Department of Child Protection Services, and immediately a referral shall be made by the Department of Child Protection Services to the youth court intake unit, which unit shall promptly comply with Section 43-21-357. In the course of an investigation, at the initial time of contact with the individual(s) about whom a report has been made under this Youth Court Act or with the individual(s) responsible for the health or welfare of a child about whom a report has been made under this chapter, the Department of Child Protection Services shall inform the individual of the specific complaints or allegations made against the individual.  Consistent with subsection (4), the identity of the person who reported his or her suspicion shall not be disclosed at that point.  Where appropriate, the Department of Child Protection Services shall additionally make a referral to the youth court prosecutor. Upon receiving a report that a child has been sexually abused, is a victim of commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking or has been burned, tortured, mutilated or otherwise physically abused in such a manner as to cause serious bodily harm, or upon receiving any report of abuse that would be a felony under state or federal law, the Department of Child Protection Services shall immediately notify the law enforcement agency in whose jurisdiction the abuse occurred.  Within forty-eight (48) hours, the department must notify the appropriate prosecutor and the Statewide Human Trafficking Coordinator.  The department shall have the duty to provide the law enforcement agency all the names and facts known at the time of the report; this duty shall be of a continuing nature.  The law enforcement agency and the department shall investigate the reported abuse immediately and shall file a preliminary report with the appropriate prosecutor's office within twenty-four (24) hours and shall make additional reports as new or additional information or evidence becomes available.  The department shall advise the clerk of the youth court and the youth court prosecutor of all cases of abuse reported to the department within seventy-two (72) hours and shall update such report as information becomes available.  In addition, if the Department of Child Protection Services determines that a parent or other person responsible for the care or welfare of an abused or neglected child maintains active duty status within the military, the department shall notify the applicable military installation family advocacy program that there is an allegation of abuse or neglect that relates to that child. (2)  Any report shall contain the names and addresses of the child and his parents or other persons responsible for his care, if known, the child's age, the nature and extent of the child's injuries, including any evidence of previous injuries, any other information that might be helpful in establishing the cause of the injury, and the identity of the perpetrator. (3)  The Department of Child Protection Services shall maintain a statewide incoming wide-area telephone service or similar service for the purpose of receiving reports of suspected cases of child abuse, commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking; provided that any attorney, physician, dentist, intern, resident, nurse, psychologist, social worker, family protection worker, family protection specialist, child caregiver, minister, law enforcement officer or public or private school employee who is required to report under subsection (1) of this section shall report in the manner required in subsection (1). (4)  Reports of abuse, neglect and commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking made under this chapter and the identity of the reporter are confidential except when the court in which the investigation report is filed, in its discretion, determines the testimony of the person reporting to be material to a judicial proceeding or when the identity of the reporter is released to law enforcement agencies and the appropriate prosecutor pursuant to subsection (1).  Reports made under this section to any law enforcement agency or prosecutorial officer are for the purpose of criminal investigation and prosecution only and no information from these reports may be released to the public except as provided by Section 43-21-261. Disclosure of any information by the prosecutor shall be according to the Mississippi Uniform Rules of Circuit and County Court Procedure.  The identity of the reporting party shall not be disclosed to anyone other than law enforcement officers or prosecutors without an order from the appropriate youth court.  Any person disclosing any reports made under this section in a manner not expressly provided for in this section or Section 43-21-261 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to the penalties prescribed by Section 43-21-267. Notwithstanding the confidentiality of the reporter's identity under this section, the Department of Child Protection Services may disclose a reporter's identity to the appropriate law enforcement agency or prosecutor if the department has reason to suspect the reporter has made a fraudulent report, and the Department of Child Protection Services must provide to the subject of the alleged fraudulent report written notification of the disclosure. (5)  All final dispositions of law enforcement investigations described in subsection (1) of this section shall be determined only by the appropriate prosecutor or court.  All final dispositions of investigations by the Department of Child Protection Services as described in subsection (1) of this section shall be determined only by the youth court.  Reports made under subsection (1) of this section by the Department of Child Protection Services to the law enforcement agency and to the district attorney's office shall include the following, if known to the department: (a)  The name and address of the child; (b)  The names and addresses of the parents; (c)  The name and address of the suspected perpetrator; (d)  The names and addresses of all witnesses, including the reporting party if a material witness to the abuse; (e)  A brief statement of the facts indicating that the child has been abused, including whether the child experienced commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking, and any other information from the agency files or known to the family protection worker or family protection specialist making the investigation, including medical records or other records, which may assist law enforcement or the district attorney in investigating and/or prosecuting the case; and (f)  What, if any, action is being taken by the Department of Child Protection Services. (6)  In any investigation of a report made under this chapter of the abuse or neglect of a child as defined in Section 43-21-105(l) or (m), the Department of Child Protection Services may request the appropriate law enforcement officer with jurisdiction to accompany the department in its investigation, and in such cases the law enforcement officer shall comply with such request. (7)  Anyone who willfully violates any provision of this section shall be, upon being found guilty, punished by a fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by imprisonment in jail not to exceed one (1) year, or both. (8)  If a report is made directly to the Department of Child Protection Services that a child has been abused or neglected or experienced commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking in an out-of-home setting, a referral shall be made immediately to the law enforcement agency in whose jurisdiction the abuse occurred and the department shall notify the district attorney's office and the Statewide Human Trafficking Coordinator within forty-eight (48) hours of such report.  The Department of Child Protection Services shall investigate the out-of-home setting report of abuse or neglect to determine whether the child who is the subject of the report, or other children in the same environment, comes within the jurisdiction of the youth court and shall report to the youth court the department's findings and recommendation as to whether the child who is the subject of the report or other children in the same environment require the protection of the youth court.  The law enforcement agency shall investigate the reported abuse immediately and shall file a preliminary report with the district attorney's office within forty-eight (48) hours and shall make additional reports as new information or evidence becomes available.  If the out-of-home setting is a licensed facility, an additional referral shall be made by the Department of Child Protection Services to the licensing agency. The licensing agency shall investigate the report and shall provide the department, the law enforcement agency and the district attorney's office with their written findings from such investigation as well as that licensing agency's recommendations and actions taken. (9)  If a child protective investigation does not result in an out-of-home placement, a child protective investigator must provide information to the parent or guardians about community service programs that provide respite care, counseling and support for children who have experienced commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking, voluntary guardianship or other support services for families in crisis. SECTION 24.  Section 43-21-354, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-354.  The statewide incoming wide area telephone service established pursuant to Section 43-21-353 shall be maintained by the Department of Child Protection Services, or its successor, on a twenty-four-hour seven (7) days a week basis. SECTION 25.  Section 43-21-355, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-355.  Any attorney, physician, dentist, intern, resident, nurse, psychologist, social worker, family protection worker, family protection specialist, child caregiver, minister, law enforcement officer, school attendance officer, public school district employee, nonpublic school employee, licensed professional counselor or any other person participating in the making of a required report pursuant to Section 43-21-353 or participating in an investigation, evaluation or judicial proceeding resulting from the report shall be presumed to be acting in good faith.  Any person or institution reporting or participating in an investigation, evaluation or judicial proceeding resulting from the report in good faith shall be immune from any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed. SECTION 26.  Section 43-21-357, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-357.  (1)  After receiving a report, the youth court intake unit shall promptly make a preliminary inquiry to determine whether the interest of the child, other children in the same environment or the public requires the youth court to take further action.  As part of the preliminary inquiry, the youth court intake unit may request or the youth court may order the Department of Child Protection Services, the Department of Human Services - Division of Youth Services, any successor agency or any other qualified public employee to make an investigation or report concerning the child and any other children in the same environment, and present the findings thereof to the youth court intake unit. If the youth court intake unit receives a neglect or abuse report, the youth court intake unit shall immediately forward the complaint to the Department of Child Protection Services to promptly make an investigation or report concerning the child and any other children in the same environment and promptly present the findings thereof to the youth court intake unit.  If it appears from the preliminary inquiry that the child or other children in the same environment are within the jurisdiction of the court, the youth court intake unit shall recommend to the youth court: (a)  That the youth court take no action; (b)  That an informal adjustment be made; (c)  That the Department of Child Protection Services monitor the child, family and other children in the same environment; (d)  That the child is warned or counseled informally; (e)  That the child be referred to the youth court intervention court; or (f)  That a petition be filed. (2)  The youth court shall then, without a hearing: (a)  Order that no action be taken; (b)  Order that an informal adjustment be made; (c)  Order that the Department of Child Protection Services monitor the child, family and other children in the same environment; (d)  Order that the child is warned or counseled informally; (e)  That the child be referred to the youth intervention court; or (f)  Order that a petition be filed. (3)  If the preliminary inquiry discloses that a child needs emergency medical treatment, the judge may order the necessary treatment. SECTION 27.  Section 43-21-651, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-651.  (1)  (a)  The court to which appeals may be taken from final orders or decrees of the youth court shall be the Supreme Court of Mississippi pursuant to the Rules of Appellate Procedure.  Final Orders in youth court include orders that grant durable legal custody or durable legal relative guardianship, transfer jurisdiction over the minor child to another court, such as for an adoption, or otherwise terminate the jurisdiction of the youth court over the minor child. All factual findings, legal determinations, and adjudication of issues by the youth court prior to the time the final order is entered are preserved for appellate review and any common law to the contrary is expressly abrogated. Any matters adjudicated by the youth court through interim orders such as adjudication/disposition orders, or permanency review orders, may be only appealed through the interlocutory appeal process provided by the Rules of Appellate Procedure. (b)  The rule of construction that statutes in derogation of the common law are to be strictly construed shall have no application to this subsection. (2)  In any case wherein an appeal is desired, written notice of intention to appeal shall be filed with the youth court clerk within the time, and costs in the youth court and the filing fee in the Supreme Court shall be paid, as is otherwise required for appeals to the Supreme Court.  If the appellant shall make affidavit that he is unable to pay such costs and filing fee, he shall have an appeal without prepayment of court costs and filing fee.  Only the initials of the child shall appear on the record on appeal. (3)  The pendency of an appeal shall not suspend the order or decree of the youth court regarding a child, nor shall it discharge the child from the custody of that court or of the person, institution or agency to whose care such child shall have been committed, unless the youth court or Supreme Court shall so order.  If appellant desires to appeal with supersedeas, the matter first shall be presented to the youth court.  If refused, the youth court shall forthwith issue a written order stating the reasons for the denial, which order shall be subject to review by the Supreme Court.  If the Supreme Court does not dismiss the proceedings and discharge the child, it shall affirm or modify or reverse the order of the youth court and remand the child to the jurisdiction of the youth court for placement and supervision in accordance with its order, and thereafter the child shall be and remain under the jurisdiction of the youth court in the same manner as if the youth court had made the order without an appeal having been taken. (4)  Appeals from the youth court shall be preference cases in the Supreme Court. SECTION 28.  Section 43-21-701, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-701.  (1)  There is established the Mississippi Commission on a Uniform Youth Court System and Procedures.  The commission shall consist of the following twenty-one (21) members: (a)  One (1) circuit court judge appointed by the Chief Justice of the Mississippi Supreme Court; (b)  One (1) chancery court judge, appointed by the Chief Justice of the Mississippi Supreme Court; (c)  The President of the Mississippi Council of Youth Court Judges, or his designee; (d)  Two (2) who may be either family court judges or county court judges, appointed by the President of the Mississippi Council of Youth Court Judges; (e)  Two (2) youth court referees, appointed by the President of the Mississippi Council of Youth Court Judges; (f)  One (1) member of the Mississippi House of Representatives to be appointed by the Speaker of the House; (g)  One (1) member of the Mississippi Senate to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (h)  The directors of the following state agencies or their designated representatives:  the Mississippi Department of Human Services and the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services; (i)  The director or his designated representative of the Governor's Office of Federal-State Programs; (j)  Two (2) employees, other than the commissioner, of the Department of Child Protection Services who are supervisors of social workers primarily assigned to youth cases, appointed by the Governor; (k)  One (1) employee, other than the commissioner, of the Department of Child Protection Services who is experienced with the legal process of youth court cases, appointed by the Governor; (l)  One (1) municipal police chief, appointed by the Governor; (m)  One (1) county sheriff, appointed by the Governor; (n)  Two (2) lawyers experienced in youth court work, appointed by the Governor; and (o)  Two (2) prosecuting attorneys who prosecute cases in youth court, appointed by the Governor. (2)  The members shall be appointed to the commission within fifteen (15) days of the effective date of Sections 43-21-701 and 43-21-703 and shall serve until the end of their respective terms of office, if applicable, or until October 1, 2024, whichever occurs first.  Vacancies on the commission shall be filled in the manner of the original appointment.  Members shall be eligible for reappointment provided that upon such reappointment they meet the qualifications required of a new appointee. (3)  The commission may elect any officers from among its membership as it deems necessary for the efficient discharge of the commission's duties. (4)  The commission shall adopt rules and regulations governing times and places for meetings and governing the manner of conducting its business.  Twelve (12) or more members shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting any business of the commission; provided, however, a vote of not less than fourteen (14) members shall be required for any recommendations to the Legislature. (5)  Members of the commission shall serve without compensation, except that state and county employees and officers shall receive any per diem as authorized by law from appropriations available to their respective agencies or political subdivisions.  All commission members shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for any actual and reasonable expenses incurred as a necessary incident to service on the commission, including mileage as provided by law. (6)  The commission may select and employ a research director who shall perform the duties which the commission directs, which duties shall include the hiring of such other employees for the commission as the commission may approve.  The research director and all other employees of the commission shall be in the state service and their salaries shall be established by the commission subject to approval by the State Personnel Board.  Employees of the commission shall be reimbursed for the expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their official duties in the same manner as other state employees.  The commission may also employ any consultants it deems necessary, including consultants to compile any demographic data needed to accomplish the duties of the commission. (7)  The Governor's Office of Federal-State Programs shall support the Commission on a Uniform Youth Court System and shall act as agent for any funds made available to the commission for its use.  In order to expedite the implementation of the Commission on a Uniform Youth Court System, any funds available to the Governor's Office of Federal-State Programs for the 2023-2024 fiscal year may be expended for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the commission created herein. (8)  The commission may contract for suitable office space in accordance with the provisions of Section 29-5-2, Mississippi Code of 1972.  In addition, the commission may utilize, with their consent, the services, equipment, personnel, information and resources of other state agencies; and may accept voluntary and uncompensated services, contract with individuals, public and private agencies, and request information, reports and data from any agency of the state, or any of its political subdivisions, to the extent authorized by law. (9)  In order to conduct and carry out its purposes, duties and related activities as provided for in this section and Section 43-21-703, the commission is authorized to apply for and accept gifts, grants, subsidies and other funds from persons, corporations, foundations, the United States government or other entities, provided that the receipt of such gifts, grants, subsidies and funds shall be reported and otherwise accounted for in the manner provided by law. SECTION 29.  Section 43-21-703, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-703.  (1)  The commission shall study the youth court system in Mississippi, and prepare a report including any proposed changes in the youth court system and/or its procedures. It shall submit the report to the Legislature, on or before October 1, 2024, along with a report detailing any legislation which may be needed to implement the plan.  In preparing the report, the commission shall evaluate the existing juvenile services in the state and may recommend changes in the organizational concepts, institutions, laws and resources. (2)  In formulating its report, the commission shall take into consideration the following: (a)  Whether a uniform statewide youth court system would be desirable; (b)  How best the service needs of the state could be met in relation to the taxing and resource capacity of various multi-county districts now existing or proposed; (c)  Whether counties in a given service area or district may develop district shelters, detention centers and diagnostic centers to serve a multi-county area; and (d)  What proposals or alternatives would update or modernize the system to provide staffing for all counties and citizens. (3)  The commission, in addition to recommending the plan described in this section, shall serve as a clearinghouse and information center for the collection, preparation, analysis and dissemination of information on the youth court system in Mississippi and shall conduct ongoing research relating to the improvement of the youth court system.  Pursuant to its duties under this subsection, the commission may request the regular submission to it of such reports, information and statistics by the courts, judges, prosecuting attorneys and agencies of this state which the commission deems necessary for the development of its reports. SECTION 30.  Section 43-21-753, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-753.  The youth court of any county in the state may establish a teen court program for the diversion of certain offenders who have waived all right of confidentiality and privilege against self-incrimination.  The youth court of Rankin County may extend its teen court program within the city limits of Pearl.  The offenders eligible to participate shall be those offenders who in the discretion of the youth court are suitable and compulsory-school-age children who have come into the jurisdiction of the youth court as a result of not attending school.  The teen court shall be a preventive program for juveniles comprised of youth who are not less than thirteen (13) nor more than seventeen (17) years of age, which students shall serve as prosecutor, defense counsel, bailiff, court clerk and jurors.  The program is to administer the "sentencing" or disposition phase of the proceedings against offenders who elect to participate, shall be under the guidance of the local youth court, and shall be approved by the local youth court.  The youth court judge, or his designee who is a licensed attorney, shall preside.  The teen court is authorized to require eligible offenders who choose to go to teen court in lieu of youth court to perform up to one hundred twelve (112) hours of community service, require offenders to make a personal apology to a victim, require offenders to submit a research paper on any relevant subject, attend counseling and make restitution or any other disposition authorized by the youth court.  The youth court shall establish rules and regulations, including sentencing guidelines, for the operation of a teen court.  The teen court is authorized to accept monies from any available public or private source, including public or private donations, grants, gifts and appropriated funds for funding expenses of operating the court. Teen court may be held at whatever location the youth court selects at whatever time or times.  Eligible offenders shall be only those children who agree to participate in the teen court and to abide by the teen court's rulings, whose parents or legal guardian shall also so agree, and who are otherwise qualified to participate. The youth court judge may require an offender who elects to participate in the teen court to pay a fee not to exceed Five Dollars ($5.00); any such fees shall be used in administering this article, and the fee shall not be refunded, regardless of whether the child successfully completes the teen court program. SECTION 31.  Section 43-21-801, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-21-801.  (1) There is established the Youth Court Support Program.  The purpose of the program shall be to ensure that all youth courts have sufficient support funds to carry on the business of the youth court.  The Administrative Office of Courts shall establish a formula consistent with this section for providing state support payable from the Youth Court Support Fund for the support of the youth courts. (a)  (i)  Each regular youth court referee is eligible for youth court support funds so long as the senior chancellor does not elect to employ a youth court administrator as set forth in paragraph (b); a municipal youth court judge is also eligible.  The Administrative Office of Courts shall direct any funds to the appropriate county or municipality.  The funds shall be utilized to compensate an intake officer who shall be responsible for ensuring that all intake and case information for the Department of Human Services - Division of Youth Services, truancy matters, and the Department of Child Protection Services is entered into the Mississippi Youth Court Information Delivery System (MYCIDS) in an accurate and timely manner.  If the court already has an intake officer responsible for entering all cases of the Department of Human Services - Division of Youth Services, truancy matters, and the Department of Child Protection Services into MYCIDS, the regular youth court referee or municipal court judge may certify to the Administrative Office of Courts that such a person is already on staff.  In such a case, each regular youth court referee or municipal youth court judge shall have the sole individual discretion to appropriate those funds as expense monies to assist in hiring secretarial staff and acquiring materials and equipment incidental to carrying on the business of the court within the private practice of law of the referee or judge, or may direct the use of those funds through the county or municipal budget for court support supplies or services.  The regular youth court referee and municipal youth court judge shall be accountable for assuring through private, county or municipal employees the proper preparation and filing of all necessary tracking and other documentation attendant to the administration of the youth court. (ii)  Title to all tangible property, excepting stamps, stationery and minor expendable office supplies, procured with funds authorized by this section, shall be and forever remain in the county or municipality to be used by the judge or referee during the term of his office and thereafter by his successors. (b)  (i)  When permitted by the Administrative Office of Courts and as funds are available, the senior chancellor for Chancery Districts One, Two, Three, Four, Six, Seven, Nine, Ten, Thirteen, Fourteen, Fifteen and Eighteen may appoint a youth court administrator for the district whose responsibility will be to perform all reporting, tracking and other duties of a court administrator for all youth courts in the district that are under the chancery court system.  Any chancery district listed in this paragraph in which a chancellor appoints a referee or special master to hear any youth court matter is ineligible for funding under this paragraph (b).  The Administrative Office of Courts may allocate to an eligible chancery district a sum not to exceed Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00) per year for the salary, fringe benefits and equipment of the youth court administrator, and an additional sum not to exceed One Thousand Nine Hundred Dollars ($1,900.00) for the administrator's travel expenses. (ii)  The appointment of a youth court administrator shall be evidenced by the entry of an order on the minutes of the court.  The person appointed shall serve at the will and pleasure of the senior chancellor but shall be an employee of the Administrative Office of Courts. (iii)  The Administrative Office of Courts must approve the position, job description and salary before the position can be filled.  The Administrative Office of Courts shall not approve any plan that does not first require the expenditure of the funds from the Youth Court Support Fund before expenditure of county funds is authorized for that purpose. (iv)  Title to any tangible property procured with funds authorized under this paragraph shall be and forever remain in the State of Mississippi. (c)  (i)  Each county court is eligible for youth court support funds.  The funds shall be utilized to provide compensation to an intake officer who shall be responsible for ensuring that all intake and case information for the Department of Human Services - Division of Youth Services, truancy matters, and the Department of Child Protection Services is entered into the Mississippi Youth Court Information Delivery System (MYCIDS) in an accurate and timely manner.  If the county court already has an intake officer or other staff person responsible for entering all cases of the Department of Human Services - Division of Youth Services, truancy matters and the Department of Child Protection Services into MYCIDS, the senior county court judge may certify that such a person is already on staff.  In such a case, the senior county court judge shall have discretion to direct the expenditure of those funds in hiring other support staff to carry on the business of the court. (ii)  For the purposes of this paragraph, "support staff" means court administrators, law clerks, legal research assistants, secretaries, resource administrators or case managers appointed by a youth court judge, or any combination thereof, but shall not mean school attendance officers. (iii)  The appointment of support staff shall be evidenced by the entry of an order on the minutes of the court.  The support staff so appointed shall serve at the will and pleasure of the senior county court judge but shall be an employee of the county. (iv)  The Administrative Office of Courts must approve the positions, job descriptions and salaries before the positions may be filled.  The Administrative Office of Courts shall not approve any plan that does not first require the expenditure of funds from the Youth Court Support Fund before expenditure of county funds is authorized for that purpose. (v)  The Administrative Office of Courts may approve expenditure from the fund for additional equipment for support staff appointed pursuant to this paragraph if the additional expenditure falls within the formula.  Title to any tangible property procured with funds authorized under this paragraph shall be and forever remain in the county to be used by the youth court and support staff. (2)  (a)  (i)  The formula developed by the Administrative Office of Courts for providing youth court support funds shall be devised so as to distribute appropriated funds proportional to caseload and other appropriate factors as set forth in regulations promulgated by the Administrative Office of Courts.  The formula will determine a reasonable maximum amount per judge or referee per annum that will not be exceeded in allocating funds under this section. (ii)  The formula shall be reviewed by the Administrative Office of Courts every two (2) years to ensure that the youth court support funds provided herein are proportional to each youth court's caseload and other specified factors. (iii)  The Administrative Office of Courts shall have wide latitude in the first two-year cycle to implement a formula designed to maximize caseload data collection. (b)  Application to receive funds under this section shall be submitted in accordance with procedures established by the Administrative Office of Courts. (c)  Approval of the use of any of the youth court support funds distributed under this section shall be made by the Administrative Office of Courts in accordance with procedures established by the Administrative Office of Courts. (3)  (a)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Youth Court Support Fund," which shall consist of funds appropriated or otherwise made available by the Legislature in any manner and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.  Monies in the fund shall be distributed to the youth courts by the Administrative Office of Courts for the purposes described in this section. (b)  (i)  During the regular legislative session held in calendar year * * * 2007 2026, the Legislature may appropriate an amount not to exceed * * * Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) Seven Million Dollars ($7,000,000.00) to the Youth Court Support Fund. (ii)  During each regular legislative session subsequent to the * * * 2007 2026 Regular Session, the Legislature shall appropriate * * * Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) Seven Million Dollars ($7,000,000.00) to the Youth Court Support Fund. (c)  No youth court judge or youth court referee shall be eligible to receive funding from the Youth Court Support Fund who has not received annual continuing education in the field of juvenile justice in an amount to conform with the requirements of the Rules and Regulations for Mandatory Continuing Judicial Education promulgated by the Supreme Court or received at least one (1) hour of annual continuing education concerning oversight of youth court intake officers and MYCIDS.  The Administrative Office of Courts shall maintain records of all referees and youth court judges regarding such training and shall not disburse funds to any county or municipality for the budget of a youth court judge or referee who is not in compliance with the judicial training requirements. (4)  Any recipient of funds from the Youth Court Support Fund shall not be eligible for continuing disbursement of funds if the recipient is not in compliance with the terms, conditions and reporting requirements set forth in the procedures promulgated by the Administrative Office of Courts. (5)  The provisions of this section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2026. SECTION 32.  Section 9-5-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-5-1.  A chancellor shall be elected for and from each of the chancery court districts as provided in this chapter and the listing of individual counties and precincts shall be those counties and precincts as they existed on July 1, 2025.  He shall hold court in any other district with the consent of the chancellor thereof when in their opinion the public interest may be thereby promoted.  The terms of all chancellors elected at the regular election for the year 1930 shall begin on the first day of January, 1931, and their terms of office shall continue for four (4) years.  A chancellor shall be a resident of the district in which he serves by the date on which the person qualifies as a candidate for the judicial office but shall not be required to be a resident of a subdistrict if the district is divided into subdistricts. SECTION 33.  Section 9-5-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-5-3.  (1)  The state shall be divided into an appropriate number of chancery court districts, severally numbered and composed of the counties as set forth in the sections which follow.  A court to be styled "The Chancery Court of the County of ____" shall be held in each county, and within each judicial district of a county having two (2) judicial districts, at least twice a year.  Court shall be held in chancery court districts consisting of a single county on the same dates state agencies and political subdivisions are open for business excluding legal holidays.  The dates upon which terms shall commence and the number of days for which terms shall continue in chancery court districts consisting of more than one (1) county shall be set by order of the chancellor in accordance with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section.  A matter in court may extend past a term if the interest of justice so requires. (2)  An order establishing the commencement and continuation of terms of court for each of the counties within a chancery court district consisting of more than one (1) county shall be entered annually and not later than October 1 of the year immediately preceding the calendar year for which the terms of court are to become effective.  Notice of the dates upon which terms of court shall commence and the number of days for which the terms shall continue in each of the counties within a chancery court district shall be posted in the office of the chancery clerk of each county within the district and mailed to the office of the Secretary of State for publication and distribution to all Mississippi Bar members.  If an order is not timely entered, the terms of court for each of the counties within the chancery court district shall remain unchanged for the next calendar year. (3)  The number of chancellorships for each chancery court district shall be determined by the Legislature based upon the following criteria: (a)  The population of the district; (b)  The number of cases filed in the district; (c)  The caseload of each chancellor in the district; (d)  The geographic area of the district; (e)  An analysis of the needs of the district by the court personnel of the district; and (f)  Any other appropriate criteria, as determined by the Legislature. (4)  The Judicial College of the University of Mississippi Law Center and the Administrative Office of Courts shall determine the appropriate: (a)  Specific data to be collected as a basis for applying the above criteria; (b)  Method of collecting and maintaining the specified data; and (c)  Method of assimilating the specified data. (5)  In a district having more than one (1) office of chancellor, there shall be no distinction whatsoever in the powers, duties and emoluments of those offices except that the chancellor who has been for the longest time continuously a chancellor of that court or, should no chancellor have served longer in office than the others, the chancellor who has been for the longest time a member of The Mississippi Bar shall be the senior chancellor.  The senior chancellor shall have the right to assign causes and dockets and to set terms in districts consisting of more than one (1) county. SECTION 34.  Section 9-5-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-5-5.  The First Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Alcorn County; (b)  Itawamba County; (c)  Lee County; (d)  Monroe County; (e)  Pontotoc County; (f)  Prentiss County; (g)  Tishomingo County; and (h)  Union County. SECTION 35.  Section 9-5-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-5-7.  (1)  There shall be four (4) chancellors for the First Chancery Court District. (2)  The four (4) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One," "Place Two," "Place Three" and "Place Four."  The chancellor to fill Place One must be a resident of Alcorn, Prentiss or Tishomingo County.  The chancellors to fill Place Two and Place Three must reside in Itawamba, Lee, Monroe, Pontotoc or Union County.  The chancellor to fill Place Four may be a resident of any county in the district.  Election of the four (4) offices of chancellor shall be by election to be held in every county within the First Chancery Court District. SECTION 36.  Section 9-5-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-9.  The Second Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Jasper County; (b)  Newton County; and (c)  Scott County. [From and after January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-9.  (1)  The Second Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Covington County; (b)  Jasper County; (c)  Jefferson Davis County; (d)  Newton County; (e)  Simpson County; (f)  Scott County; and (g)  Smith County. (2)  There shall be three (3) chancellors for the Second Chancery Court District.  The three (3) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One," "Place Two" and "Place Three."  The chancellor to fill Place One must reside in either Jasper County, Newton County or Scott County.  The chancellor to fill Place Two must reside in either Covington County, Jefferson Davis County, Simpson County, or Smith County.  The chancellor to fill Place Three may reside in any county in the district. SECTION 37.  Section 9-5-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-11.  (1)  The Third Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  DeSoto County; (b)  Grenada County; (c)  Montgomery County; (d)  Panola County; (e)  Tate County; and (f)  Yalobusha County. (2)  The Third Chancery Court District shall be divided into two (2) subdistricts as follows: (a)  Subdistrict 3-1 shall consist of DeSoto County. (b)  Subdistrict 3-2 shall consist of Grenada County, Montgomery County, Panola County, Tate County and Yalobusha County. [From and after January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-11.  The Third Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Carroll County; (b)  Grenada County; (c)  Montgomery County; (d)  Panola County; (e)  Tallahatchie County; (f)  Tate County; and (g)  Yalobusha County. SECTION 38.  Section 9-5-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-13.  (1)  There shall be three (3) chancellors for the Third Chancery Court District. (2)  (a)  The chancellor of Subdistrict 3-1 shall be elected from DeSoto County.  The two (2) chancellors of Subdistrict 3-2 shall be elected from Grenada County, Montgomery County, Panola County, Tate County and Yalobusha County. (b)  For purposes of appointment and election, the three (3) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct.  The chancellorship in Subdistrict 3-1 shall be denominated only as "Place One," and the chancellorships in Subdistrict 3-2 shall be denominated only as "Place Two" and "Place Three." [From and after January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-13.  (1)  There shall be two (2) chancellors for the Third Chancery Court District. (2)  For purposes of appointment and election only, the two (2) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated as "Place One" and "Place Two."  The chancellor of Place One must reside in Tate County, Panola County or Yalobusha County.  The chancellor of Place Two must reside in Carroll County, Grenada County, Montgomery County or Tallahatchie County. SECTION 39.  Section 9-5-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2031, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-17.  (1)  The Fifth Chancery Court District is composed of Hinds County. (2)  The Fifth Chancery Court District shall be divided into the following four (4) subdistricts: (a)  Subdistrict 5-1 shall consist of the following precincts in Hinds County:  1, 2, 4, 6, 8, 9, 10, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 44, 45, 46, 47, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 92, 93, 96 and 97. (b)  Subdistrict 5-2 shall consist of the following precincts in Hinds County:  11, 12, 13, 14, 16, 17, 23, 27, 28, 29, 30, 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, Brownsville, Cynthia, Pocahontas and Tinnin. (c)  Subdistrict 5-3 shall consist of the following precincts in Hinds County:  18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 24, 25, 26, 31, 49, 50, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 60, 61, 62, 63, 64, 67, 68, 69, 70, 71, 86 and 89. (d)  Subdistrict 5-4 shall consist of the following precincts in Hinds County:  87, 88, 90, 91, 94, 95, Bolton, Byram 1, Byram 2, Byram 3, Cayuga, Chapel Hill, Clinton 1, Clinton 2, Clinton 3, Clinton 4, Clinton 5, Clinton 6, Clinton 7, Dry Grove, Edwards, Learned, Old Byram, Pinehaven, Raymond 1, Raymond 2, Spring Ridge, St. Thomas, Terry 1, Terry 2, Utica 1 and Utica 2. [From and after January 1, 2031, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-17.  The Fifth Chancery Court District is composed of Hinds County. SECTION 40.  Section 9-5-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2031, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-19.  (1)  There shall be four (4) chancellors for the Fifth Chancery Court District.  One (1) chancellor shall be elected from each subdistrict. (2)  While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the said chancellors other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws of this state, the court in the First Judicial District of Hinds County, in the discretion of the senior chancellor, may be divided into four (4) divisions as a matter of convenience by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court. [From and after January 1, 2031, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-19.  (1)  There shall be four (4) chancellors for the Fifth Chancery Court District.  The four (4) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One," "Place Two," "Place Three" and "Place Four." (2)  While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the said chancellors other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws of this state, the court in the First Judicial District of Hinds County, in the discretion of the senior chancellor, may be divided into four (4) divisions as a matter of convenience by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court. SECTION 41.  Section 9-5-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-21.  The Sixth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Attala County; (b)  Carroll County; (c)  Choctaw County; (d)  Kemper County; (e)  Neshoba County; and (f)  Winston County. [From and after January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-21.  The Sixth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Attala County; (b)  Choctaw County; (c)  Kemper County; (d)  Neshoba County; (e)  Webster County; and (f)  Winston County. SECTION 42.  Section 9-5-22, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-22.  (1)  There shall be two (2) chancellors for the Sixth Chancery Court District. (2)  The two (2) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One" and "Place Two." [From and after January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-22.  (1)  There shall be two (2) chancellors for the Sixth Chancery Court District. (2)  The two (2) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One" and "Place Two."  The chancellor for "Place One" must reside in Attala County, Choctaw County or Webster County.  The chancellor for "Place Two" must reside in Winston County, Neshoba County or Kemper County. SECTION 43.  Section 9-5-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-23.  (1)  The Seventh Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Bolivar County; (b)  Coahoma County; (c)  Leflore County; (d)  Quitman County; (e)  Tallahatchie County; and (f)  Tunica County. (2)  The Seventh Chancery Court District shall be divided into two (2) subdistricts as follows: (a)  Subdistrict 7-1 shall consist of Bolivar County and Coahoma County; (b)  Subdistrict 7-2 shall consist of Leflore County, Quitman County, Tallahatchie County and Tunica County. [From and after January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-23.  (1)  The Seventh Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Bolivar County; (b)  Coahoma County; (c)  Leflore County; (d)  Quitman County; (e)  Sunflower County; and (f)  Tunica County. (2)  The Seventh Chancery Court District shall be divided into two (2) subdistricts as follows: (a)  Subdistrict 7-1 shall consist of Bolivar County, Tunica County, Quitman County, and Coahoma County; (b)  Subdistrict 7-2 shall consist of Leflore County and Sunflower County. SECTION 44.  Section 9-5-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-25.  There shall be three (3) chancellors for the Seventh Chancery Court District.  The three (3) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct.  One (1) chancellor shall be elected from Subdistrict 7-1 and shall be denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One," and two (2) chancellors shall be elected from Subdistrict 7-2 and shall be denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place Two" and "Place Three." [From and after January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-25.  There shall be two (2) chancellors for the Seventh Chancery Court District.  The two (2) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct.  One (1) chancellor shall be elected from each subdistrict. SECTION 45.  Section 9-5-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-27.  The Eighth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Hancock County; (b)  Harrison County; and (c)  Stone County. [From and after January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-27.  The Eighth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Hancock County; and (b)  Harrison County. SECTION 46.  Section 9-5-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-5-29.  (1)  There shall be four (4) chancellors for the Eighth Chancery Court District. (2)  The four (4) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One," "Place Two," "Place Three" and "Place Four." (3)  While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the chancellors other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws of this state, the court in the Eighth Chancery Court District, in the discretion of the senior chancellor, may be divided into four (4) divisions as a matter of convenience by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court. SECTION 47.  Section 9-5-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-31.  (1)  The Ninth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Humphreys County; (b)  Issaquena County; (c)  Sharkey County; (d)  Sunflower County; (e)  Warren County; and (f)  Washington County. (2)  The Ninth Chancery Court District shall be divided into three (3) subdistricts as follows: (a)  Subdistrict 9-1 shall consist of the following precincts in the following counties: (i)  Sunflower County:  Boyer-Linn, Drew, Fairview-Hale, Indianola 2 East*, Indianola 3 North*, Indianola 3 Northeast*, Indianola 3 South*, Rome, Ruleville, Ruleville North and Sunflower Plantation; and (ii)  Washington County:  American Legion, Brent Center, Buster Brown Community Center, Darlove Baptist Church*, Elks Club, Extension Building, Grace Methodist Church*, Greenville Industrial College, Leland Health Department Clinic, Leland Rotary Club, Metcalf City Hall and Potter House Church. (b)  Subdistrict 9-2 shall consist of Humphreys County and the following precincts in the following counties: (i)  Sunflower County:  Doddsville, Indianola 2 East*, Indianola 2 West, Indianola 3 North*, Indianola 3 Northeast*, Indianola 3 South*, Indianola Southeast, Inverness, Moorhead, Sunflower 3 and Sunflower 4; and (ii)  Washington County:  Arcola City Hall, Christ Wesleyan Methodist Church, Darlove Baptist Church*, Glen Allan Health Clinic, Grace Methodist Church*, Hollandale City Hall, St. James Episcopal Church, Swiftwater Baptist Church, Tampa Drive and Ward's Recreation Center. (c)  Subdistrict 9-3 shall consist of Issaquena County, Sharkey County and Warren County. [From and after January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-31.  (1)  The Ninth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Humphreys County; (b)  Issaquena County; (c)  Sharkey County; (d)  Warren County; and (e)  Washington County. (2)  The Ninth Chancery Court District shall be divided into two (2) subdistricts as follows: (a)  Subdistrict 9-1 shall consist of Washington County and Humphreys County; and (b)  Subdistrict 9-2 shall consist of Issaquena County, Sharkey County and Warren County. SECTION 48.  Section 9-5-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-33.  There shall be three (3) chancellors for the Ninth Chancery Court District.  One (1) chancellor shall be elected from each subdistrict. [From and after January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-33.  There shall be two (2) chancellors for the Ninth Chancery Court District.  One (1) chancellor shall be elected from each subdistrict. SECTION 49.  Section 9-5-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-35.  The Tenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Forrest County; (b)  Lamar County; (c)  Marion County; (d)  Pearl River County; and (e)  Perry County. [From and after January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-35.  The Tenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Lamar County; (b)  Marion County; (c)  Pearl River County; and (d)  Walthall County. SECTION 50.  Section 9-5-36, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-36.  (1)  There shall be four (4) chancellors for the Tenth Chancery Court District. (2)  The four (4) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One," "Place Two," "Place Three" and "Place Four."  The chancellor to fill Place One and Place Four may be a resident of any county in the district.  The chancellor to fill Place Two must be a resident of Lamar, Marion, Pearl River or Perry County.  The chancellor to fill Place Three must be a resident of Forrest County.  Election of the four (4) offices of chancellor shall be by election to be held in every county within the Tenth Chancery Court District. [From and after January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-36.  (1)  There shall be four (4) chancellors for the Tenth Chancery Court District. (2)  The four (4) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One," "Place Two," "Place Three" and "Place Four."  The chancellor to fill Place One and Place Four may be a resident of any county in the district.  The chancellor to fill Place Two must be a resident of Lamar County.  The chancellor to fill Place Three must be a resident of Pearl River County. (3)  While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the chancellors other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws of this state, the court in the Tenth Chancery Court District, in the discretion of the senior chancellor, may be divided into separate divisions for the efficient handling of cases based on subject matter, judicial economy, or other factors by entry of an order upon the minutes. SECTION 51.  Section 9-5-37, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-5-37.  (1)  The Eleventh Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Holmes County; (b)  Leake County; (c)  Madison County; and (d)  Yazoo County. (2)  The Eleventh Chancery Court District shall be divided into two (2) subdistricts as follows: (a)  Subdistrict 11-1 shall consist of Holmes County, Yazoo County and the following precincts in Madison County:  Anderson Lodge, Canton Bible Church, Canton Community Center, Ferns Chapel Freewill, Frankin Baptist Church, Madison County Baptist Family Life Center and Magnolia Heights; (b)  Subdistrict 11-2 shall consist of Leake County and the following precincts in Madison County: Camden, Cameron, First Presbyterian, Canton Catholic Parish Center, Canton Fire Station #4, Canton National Guard Amory, Canton South Liberty, Canton St. Paul Methodist, Cedar Grove, China Grove, Colonial Heights, Couparle, Farmhaven Fire Station, Fellowship Bible Church, First Baptist, Gluckstadt, Grace Crossing, Greater Mt. Levi Church, Highland Colony Baptist Church, Lake Caroline Clubhouse, Mark Apartments, Mount Hope, New Life, North Bay, Parkway Church, Pleasant Gift Church, Pleasant Green, Ridgeland First Methodist Church, Ridgeland Recreational Center, Sunnybrook, Tougaloo, Trace Ridge, Twin Lakes Baptist, Vertical Church, Victory Baptist Church and Victory Christian. SECTION 52.  Section 9-5-38, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-5-38.  There shall be three (3) chancellors for the Eleventh Chancery Court District.  The three (3) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct.  One (1) chancellor shall be elected from Subdistrict 11-1 and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One," one (1) chancellor shall be elected from Subdistrict 11-2 and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place Two," and one (1) chancellor shall be elected at large from the entire Eleventh Chancery Court District and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place Three." SECTION 53.  Section 9-5-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-5-39.  The Twelfth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Clarke County; and (b)  Lauderdale County. SECTION 54.  Section 9-5-40, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-5-40.  (1)  There shall be two (2) judges for the Twelfth Chancery Court District. (2)  The two (2) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One" and "Place Two." SECTION 55.  Section 9-5-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-41.  (1)  The Thirteenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Covington County; (b)  Jefferson Davis County; (c)  Lawrence County; (d)  Simpson County; and (e)  Smith County. (2)  There shall be two (2) chancellors for the Thirteenth Chancery Court District.  The two (2) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One" and "Place Two." [From and after January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-41.  (1)  The Thirteenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Forrest County; (b)  Perry County; and (c)  Stone County. (2)  There shall be two (2) chancellors for the Thirteenth Chancery Court District.  The two (2) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One" and "Place Two." SECTION 56.  Section 9-5-43, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-43.  (1)  The Fourteenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Chickasaw County; (b)  Clay County; (c)  Lowndes County; (d)  Noxubee County; (e)  Oktibbeha County; and (f)  Webster County. (2)  The Fourteenth Chancery Court District shall be divided into three (3) subdistricts as follows: (a)  Subdistrict 14-1 shall consist of Chickasaw County, Webster County and the following precincts in Oktibbeha County:  Bell Schoolhouse*, Bradley, Center Grove, Central Starkville*, Craig Springs, Double Springs, East Starkville*, Gillespie Street Center*, Maben, North Adaton, North Longview, North Starkville 2*, North Starkville 3, Northeast Starkville, Self Creek, South Adaton, South Longview, South Starkville*, Sturgis and West Starkville*. (b)  Subdistrict 14-2 shall consist of the following precincts in the following counties: (i)  Clay County: Cedar Bluff, Central West Point, East West Point, Siloam, South West Point and Vinton; and (ii)  Lowndes County:  Air Base A, Air Base B, Air Base C, Air Base D, Air Base E, Brandon A, Brandon B, Brandon C, Brandon D, Caledonia, Columbus High School A, Columbus High School B, Columbus High School C, Columbus High School D, Dowdle Gas Training Center B, Fairgrounds C, Fairgrounds E, Fairgrounds F, Hunt C, Lee Middle School, Mitchell A, New Hope A, New Hope B, New Hope C, New Hope D, New Hope E, Rural Hill A, Rural Hill B, Rural Hill C, Sale A, Sale B, Sale C, Steens A, Steens B, Steens C, Trinity B, Union Academy B, Union Academy C and University A. (c)  Subdistrict 14-3 shall consist of Noxubee County and the following precincts in the following counties: (i)  Clay County: Cairo, Caradine, North West Point, Pheba, Pine Bluff, Tibbee, Union Star and West West Point; (ii)  Lowndes County:  Artesia, Coleman A, Coleman B, Crawford A, Fairgrounds A, Fairgrounds B, Fairgrounds D, Fairgrounds G, Hunt A, Hunt B, Mitchell B, New Hope F, Plum Grove A, Plum Grove B, Plum Grove C, Propst Park Community Hut, Trinity A, Union Academy A, University B, West Lowndes A and West Lowndes B; and (iii)  Oktibbeha County:  Bell Schoolhouse*, Central Starkville*, East Starkville*, Gillespie Street Center*, Hickory Grove, North Starkville 2*, Oktoc, Osborn, Sessums, South Starkville*, Southeast Oktibbeha and West Starkville*. [From and after January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-43.  (1)  The Fourteenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Chickasaw County; (b)  Clay County; (c)  Lowndes County; (d)  Noxubee County; and (e)  Oktibbeha County. (2)  The Fourteenth Chancery Court District shall be divided into three (3) subdistricts as follows: (a)  Subdistrict 14-1 shall consist of Chickasaw County and the following precincts in: (i)  Oktibbeha County:  Center Grove/North Adaton, Central Starkville, Craig Springs/South Bradley, East Starkville*, Hickory Grove/Southeast Oktibbeha*, Maben, Needmore Voting District*, North Longview, North Starkville 2*, North Starkville 3, Self Creek/Double Springs, South Adaton, South Longview, South Starkville*, Sturgis/North Bradley and West Starkville*; and (ii)  Clay County: Pheba* and Pine Bluff. (b)  Subdistrict 14-2 shall consist of the following precincts in the following counties: (i)  Clay County: Cedar Bluff, Central West Point, East West Point, Siloam, South West Point and Vinton; and (ii)  Lowndes County:  Air Base, Brandon, Caledonia, East Columbus Gym, First Assembly, Immanuel, New Hope, Plum Grove*, Rural Hill, Southside Church*, Steens, Townsend Park, Trinity and University. (c)  Subdistrict 14-3 shall consist of Noxubee County and the following precincts in the following counties: (i)  Clay County: Cairo, Caradine, North West Point, Pheba*, Tibbee, Union Star and West West Point; (ii)  Lowndes County:  15th Street Church, Artesia, Coleman, Crawford, Hunt, Plum Grove*, Southside Church* and West Lowndes; and (iii)  Oktibbeha County:  Bell Schoolhouse, Central Starkville*, East Starkville*, Hickory Grove/Southeast Oktibbeha*, Needmore Voting District, North Starkville 2*, Oktoc, Osborn, Sessums, South Starkville* and West Starkville*. SECTION 57.  Section 9-5-45, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-5-45.  There shall be three (3) chancellors for the Fourteenth Chancery Court District.  One (1) chancellor shall be elected from each subdistrict. SECTION 58.  Section 9-5-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-47.  The Fifteenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Copiah County; and (b)  Lincoln County. [From and after January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-47.  (1)  The Fifteenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Claiborne County; (b)  Copiah County; (c)  Lawrence County; and (d)  Lincoln County. (2)  There shall be two (2) chancellors for the Fifteenth Chancery Court District.  The two (2) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One" and "Place Two." SECTION 59.  Section 9-5-49, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-49.  (1)  The Sixteenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  George County; (b)  Greene County; and (c)  Jackson County. (2)  The local contributions required for the maintenance of the Sixteenth Chancery Court District shall be paid on a pro rata basis by each county in the district based on the proportion of that county's population to the district as a whole according to the most recent federal decennial census.  The amount of the local contributions under this subsection (2) shall be determined by the Jackson County Board of Supervisors to be ordered by the senior chancellor of the Sixteenth Chancery Court District. [From January 1, 2027, and until January 1, 2031, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-49.  (1)  The Sixteenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  George County; and (b)  Jackson County. (2)  The local contributions required for the maintenance of the Sixteenth Chancery Court District shall be paid on a pro rata basis by each county in the district based on the proportion of that county's population to the district as a whole according to the most recent federal decennial census.  The amount of the local contributions under this subsection (2) shall be determined by the Jackson County Board of Supervisors to be ordered by the senior chancellor of the Sixteenth Chancery Court District. [From and after January 1, 2031, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-49.  The Sixteenth Chancery Court District shall be Jackson County. SECTION 60.  Section 9-5-50, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-50.  (1)  There shall be three (3) chancellors for the Sixteenth Chancery Court District. (2)  The three (3) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One," "Place Two" and "Place Three." [From and after January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-50.  (1)  There shall be four (4) chancellors for the Sixteenth Chancery Court District. (2)  The four (4) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One," "Place Two," "Place Three" and "Place Four." SECTION 61.  Section 9-5-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-51.  (1)  The Seventeenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Adams County; (b)  Claiborne County; (c)  Jefferson County; and (d)  Wilkinson County. (2)  The Seventeenth Chancery Court District shall be divided into two (2) subdistricts as follows: (a)  Subdistrict 17-1 shall consist of Claiborne County, Jefferson County, and the following precincts in Adams County:  Airport Carpenter*, Convention Center*, Foster Mound, Maryland*, Northside School, Palestine, Pine Ridge, Thompson and Washington*. (b)  Subdistrict 17-2 shall consist of Wilkinson County and the following precincts in Adams County: Beau Pre, Bellemont, By-Pass Fire Station, Carpenter*, Concord, Convention Center*, Courthouse, Duncan Park, Kingston, Liberty Park, Maryland*, Morgantown, Oakland and Washington*. (3)  There shall be two (2) chancellors for the Seventeenth Chancery Court District.  One (1) chancellor shall be elected from each subdistrict. [From and after January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-51.  (1)  The Seventeenth Chancery Court District is composed of DeSoto County. (2)  There shall be three (3) chancellors for the Seventeenth Chancery Court District.  The chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated as "Place One," "Place Two" and "Place Three."  The chancellor to fill Place One and Place Two shall be elected from all of the precincts within the district.  Place Three shall be a subdistrict denominated as 17-1 for purposes of appointment and election.  The chancellor to fill Place Three shall be elected from the following precincts in DeSoto County:  Horn Lake Central, Horn Lake East, Horn Lake High School*, Horn Lake Intermediate School, Horn Lake North, Horn Lake West, Northwest Community College*, Southhaven South and Southhaven West*. SECTION 62.  Section 9-5-53, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-5-53.  The Eighteenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Benton County; (b)  Calhoun County; (c)  Lafayette County; (d)  Marshall County; and (e)  Tippah County. SECTION 63.  Section 9-5-54, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-5-54.  (1)  There shall be two (2) chancellors for the Eighteenth Chancery Court District. (2)  The two (2) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One" and "Place Two." SECTION 64.  Section 9-5-55, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-55.  The Nineteenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Jones County; and (b)  Wayne County. [From January 1, 2027, and until January 1, 2031, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-55.  (1)  The Nineteenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Greene County; (b)  Jones County; and (c)  Wayne County. (2)  There shall be two (2) chancellors for the Nineteenth Chancery Court District.  The two (2) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One" and "Place Two."  The chancellor to fill Place One must reside in Jones County, and the chancellor to fill Place Two may reside in any county in the district, except Jones County. [From and after January 1, 2031, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-55.  (1)  The Nineteenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  George County; (b)  Greene County; (c)  Jones County; and (d)  Wayne County. (2)  There shall be two (2) chancellors for the Nineteenth Chancery Court District.  The two (2) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One" and "Place Two." The chancellor to fill Place One must reside in Jones County, and the chancellor to fill Place Two may reside in any county in the district, except Jones County. SECTION 65.  Section 9-5-57, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-5-57.  The Twentieth Chancery Court District shall be Rankin County. SECTION 66.  Section 9-5-58, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-5-58.  There shall be three (3) chancellors for the Twentieth Chancery Court District.  For purposes of appointment and election the three (3) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as "Place One," "Place Two" and "Place Three." SECTION 67.  Section 9-5-255, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-5-255.  (1)  Except as provided by subsection (9) of this section, the senior chancellor of each chancery court district in the state may apply to the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court for the appointment of one or more persons to serve as family masters in chancery in each of the counties or for all of the counties within the respective chancery court district if the senior chancellor states in writing that the chancery court district's docket is crowded enough to warrant an appointment of a family master.  The Chief Justice shall determine from the information provided by the senior chancellor if the need exists for the appointment of a family master.  If the Chief Justice determines that the need exists, a family master shall be appointed.  If the Chief Justice determines that the need does not exist, no family master shall be appointed. (2)  Family masters in chancery shall have the power to hear cases and recommend orders establishing, modifying and enforcing orders for support in matters referred to them by chancellors and judges of the circuit, county or family courts of such county. The family master in chancery shall have jurisdiction over paternity matters brought pursuant to the Mississippi Uniform Law on Paternity and referred to them by chancellors and judges of the circuit, county or family courts of such county.  As used in this section, "order for support" shall have the same meaning as such term is defined in Section 93-11-101. (3)  In all cases in which an order for support has been established and the person to whom the support obligation is owed is a nonrelated Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) family on whose behalf the Department of Human Services is providing services, the family master in chancery or any other judge or court of competent jurisdiction shall, upon proper pleading by the department and upon appropriate proceedings conducted thereon, order that the department may recover and that the obligor shall be liable for reasonable attorney's fees at a minimum of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) or an amount set by the court and court costs which the department incurs in enforcing and collecting amounts of support obligation which exceed administrative fees collected and current support owed by the obligor. (4)  Persons appointed as family masters in chancery pursuant to this section shall meet and possess all of the qualifications required of chancery and circuit court judges of this state, shall remain in office at the pleasure of the appointing chancellor, and shall receive reasonable compensation for services rendered by them, as fixed by law, or allowed by the court.  Family masters in chancery shall be paid out of any available funds budgeted by the board of supervisors of the county in which they serve; provided, however, in the event that a family master in chancery is appointed to serve in more than one county within a chancery court district, then the compensation and expenses of such master shall be equally apportioned among and paid by each of the counties in which such master serves.  The chancery clerk shall issue to such persons a certificate of appointment. (5)  Family masters in chancery shall have power to administer oaths, to take the examination of witnesses in cases referred to them, to examine and report upon all matters referred to them, and they shall have all the powers in cases referred to them properly belonging to masters or commissioners in chancery according to the practice of equity courts as heretofore exercised. (6)  Family masters in chancery shall have power to issue subpoenas for witnesses to attend before them to testify in any matter referred to them or generally in the cause, and the subpoenas shall be executed in like manner as subpoenas issued by the clerk of the court.  If any witness shall fail to appear, the master shall proceed by process of attachment to compel the witness to attend and give evidence. (7)  Family masters in chancery are authorized and empowered to conduct original hearings on matters in such county referred to such masters by any chancellor or judge of such county. (8)  In all cases heard by masters pursuant to this section, such masters shall make a written report to the chancellor or judge who refers the case to him.  Such chancellor or judge may accept, reject or modify, in whole or in part, the findings or recommendations made and reported by the master, and may recommit the matter to the master with instructions.  In all cases referred to such master, initialing for approval by the master of a proposed decree shall be sufficient to constitute the master's report. (9)  Any chancellor required by this section to appoint a person or persons to serve as family masters in chancery may forego the requirement to appoint such masters or if family masters have been appointed, such chancellor may terminate such appointments and leave such positions vacant, only if an exemption from the United States Department of Health and Human Services is obtained for the county or counties involved.  Such positions may remain vacant for as long as such exemption remains in effect. SECTION 68.  Section 9-9-14, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-9-14.  (1)  In order to relieve the crowded condition of the docket in the county court of Harrison County and particularly to facilitate and make possible the trial and disposition of the large number of causes on said docket, there shall be three (3) county judges for Harrison County provided for and elected as herein set out. (2)  For the purposes of nomination and election, the three (3) judgeships shall be separate and distinct, to be denominated for purposes of appointment, nomination and election only as "place one," "place two" and "place three."  There shall be no distinction whatsoever in the powers, duties and emoluments of the three (3) offices of county judge, except that the county judge of Harrison County who has been for the longest time continuously a county judge of said county shall have the power to assign causes, terms and dockets. (3)  While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the said county judges other than as cast upon them by the constitution and laws of this state, the county court of Harrison County may, in the discretion of the county judge who has been for the longest time continuously a judge of said court, be divided into civil, equity and criminal divisions as a matter of convenience, by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court. (4)  The Governor shall appoint some qualified person from Harrison County to fill the office of county judge hereby created, who shall hold office until his successor is elected and qualified in the manner and form as provided in Section 9-9-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, and said appointment and election shall in all respects be of the same import as if the office had heretofore been in existence and a vacancy had as of October 1, 1972, occurred therein. (5)  Each county judge shall appoint his own court reporter in accordance with Section 9-13-61, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the purpose of doing the necessary stenographic work of the court. (6)  The family court judge in Harrison County shall be the county judge for "place three" from and after the passage of House Bill No. 876, 1999 Regular Session, to serve for the term expiring December 31, 2002. SECTION 69.  Section 9-9-16, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-9-16.  (1)  In order to relieve the crowded condition of the docket in the county court of Washington County and particularly to facilitate and make possible the trial and disposition of the large number of causes on said docket, it is enacted that from and after January 1, 1976, in the manner provided herein, there shall be two (2) county judges for Washington County, Mississippi, provided for and elected as herein set out. (2)  For the purposes of nomination and election, the two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct, the presently existing judgeship and its succession to be denominated for purposes of appointment, nomination and election only as "Place One" and the judgeship hereby created and its succession for said selfsame purposes and none other to be designated as "Place Two." There shall be no distinction whatsoever in the powers, duties and emoluments of the two (2) offices of county judge, except that the county judge of Washington County who has been for the longest time continuously a county judge of said county shall have the power to assign causes, terms and dockets.  Should neither judge of said county court have served longer in said office than the other, then that judge of this county court who has been for the longest time a member of The Mississippi State Bar shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets. (3)  While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the said county judges other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws of this state, the County Court of Washington County may, in the discretion of the county judge who has been for the longest time continuously a judge of said court, be divided into civil, equity, youth and criminal divisions as a matter of convenience, by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court. (4)  Each county judge shall appoint his own court reporter in accordance with Section 9-13-61, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the purpose of doing the necessary stenographic work of the court. (5)  The additional judgeship created by this section shall remain vacant unless prior to May 10, 1975, the Board Of Supervisors of Washington County, Mississippi, shall adopt an order duly entered upon the minutes of said board stating that sufficient county funds are available for the compensation and related expenses of the additional judgeship created herein. (6)  If the order of the board of supervisors as required under subsection (5) of this section shall have been duly adopted and entered upon the minutes of said board prior to May 10, 1975, then the additional judgeship herein created shall be filled by a person elected in the regular primary and general elections to be held in 1975, and the person so elected shall hold office from January 1, 1976, for the remainder of the regular term for county judges.  All candidates for such office shall possess all of the qualifications of a circuit judge as prescribed by the State Constitution and shall qualify for election in the same manner and be governed by the same statutes as other candidates for county office.  After the first election to fill the judgeship created herein, the provisions of Section 9-9-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall apply to the judgeship created herein. SECTION 70.  Section 9-9-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-9-17.  (1)  In order to relieve the crowded condition of the docket in the county court and in the youth court of Jackson County and particularly to facilitate and make possible the trial and disposition of the large number of causes on said docket and in the youth court, there shall be two (2) county judges for Jackson County, Mississippi, provided for and elected as herein set out. (2)  For the purposes of nomination and election, the two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct, the presently existing judgeship and its succession to be denominated for purposes of appointment, nomination and election only as Place One and the judgeship hereby created and its succession for said selfsame purposes and none other to be designated as Place Two.  There shall be no distinction whatsoever in the powers, duties and emoluments of the two (2) offices of county judge, except that the county judge of Jackson County who has been for the longest time continuously a county judge of said county shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets. (3)  While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the said county judges other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws of this state, the county court of Jackson County may, in the discretion of the county judge who has been for the longest time continuously a judge of said court, be divided into civil, equity, criminal and youth court divisions as a matter of convenience by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court. (4)  The two (2) county judges shall be elected at the same time and in the same manner now prescribed by law for the existing judgeship of Jackson County. (5)  The Board of Supervisors of Jackson County may, in its discretion, set aside, appropriate and expend monies from the general fund to be used in the payment of salaries of judges, clerks, reporters, officers and employees of the youth court division of the county court, including the related facilities of the youth court division of the county court, and such funds shall be expended for no other purposes. The county shall not be reimbursed for the amount of any such levy provided for by this section under the terms of the Homestead Exemption Law. SECTION 71.  Section 9-9-18, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-9-18.  (1)  In order to relieve the crowded condition of the docket in the county court and in the youth court of Rankin County and particularly to facilitate and make possible the trial and disposition of the large number of causes on the docket and in the youth court, there shall be two (2) county judges for Rankin County, provided for and elected as herein set out. (2)  For the purposes of nomination and election, the two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct, the presently existing judgeship and its succession to be denominated for purposes of appointment, nomination and election only as "Place One" and the judgeship hereby created and its succession for said selfsame purposes and none other to be designated as "Place Two."  There shall be no distinction whatsoever in the powers, duties and emoluments of the two (2) offices of county judge, except that the county judge of Rankin County who has been for the longest time continuously a county judge of the county shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets.  Should neither judge of the county court have served longer in office than the other, then that judge of this county court who has been for the longest time a member of The Mississippi Bar shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets. (3)  While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the county judges other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws of this state, the county court of Rankin County may, in the discretion of the county judge who has been for the longest time continuously a judge of the court, be divided into civil, equity, criminal and youth court divisions as a matter of convenience by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court. (4)  The initial holder of the additional judgeship created by this section, or "Place Two," shall be elected in the regular election of November 2002; candidates therefor shall qualify to run not later than forty-five (45) days before that election.  The person elected shall begin the term of office in January of 2003 at the same time as county judges generally, and there shall be no vacancy of the office before that time.  The two (2) judges shall otherwise be elected, and any vacancy in office filled, as provided for county judges generally. (5)  The Board of Supervisors of Rankin County may, in its discretion, set aside, appropriate and expend monies from the general fund to be used in the payment of salaries of judges, clerks, reporters, officers and employees of the youth court division of the county court, including the related facilities of the youth court division of the county court, and such funds shall be expended for no other purposes.  The county shall not be reimbursed for the amount of any such levy provided for by this section under the terms of the Homestead Exemption Law. SECTION 72.  Section 9-9-18.1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-9-18.1.  (1) In order to relieve the crowded condition of the docket in the county court and in the youth court of Madison County and particularly to facilitate and make possible the trial and disposition of the large number of causes on the docket and in the youth court, there shall be two (2) county judges for Madison County, provided for and elected as herein set out. (2)  For the purposes of nomination and election, the two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct, the presently existing judgeship and its succession to be denominated for purposes of appointment, nomination and election only as "Place One" and the judgeship hereby created and its succession for said selfsame purposes and none other to be designated as "Place Two."  There shall be no distinction whatsoever in the powers, duties and emoluments of the two (2) offices of county judge, except that the county judge of Madison County who has been for the longest time continuously a county judge of the county shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets.  Should neither judge of the county court have served longer in office than the other, then that judge of this county court who has been for the longest time a member of The Mississippi Bar shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets. (3)  While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the county judges other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws of this state, the county court of Madison County may, in the discretion of the county judge who has been for the longest time continuously a judge of the court, be divided into civil, equity, criminal and youth court divisions as a matter of convenience by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court. (4)  The initial holder of the additional judgeship created by this section, or "Place Two," shall be elected in the regular election of November 2002; candidates therefor shall qualify to run not later than forty-five (45) days before that election.  The person elected shall begin the term of office in January of 2003 at the same time as county judges generally, and there shall be no vacancy of the office before that time.  The two (2) judges shall otherwise be elected, and any vacancy in office filled, as provided for county judges generally. (5)  The Board of Supervisors of Madison County may, in its discretion, set aside, appropriate and expend monies from the general fund to be used in the payment of salaries of judges, clerks, reporters, officers and employees of the youth court division of the county court, including the related facilities of the youth court division of the county court, and such funds shall be expended for no other purposes.  The county shall not be reimbursed for the amount of any such levy provided for by this section under the terms of the Homestead Exemption Law. SECTION 73.  Section 9-9-18.2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-9-18.2.  (1)  In order to relieve the crowded condition of the docket in the courts and in the youth court of Pearl River County and particularly to facilitate and make possible the trial and disposition of the large number of causes on the docket and in the youth court, there shall be a county court with one (1) county judge for Pearl River County, provided for and elected as herein set out. (2)  The county court of Pearl River County may, in the discretion of the county judge, be divided into civil, equity, criminal and youth court divisions as a matter of convenience by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court. (3)  The initial holder of the judgeship created by this section shall be elected in the regular election of November 2010; candidates therefor shall qualify to run not later than sixty (60) days before that election.  The person elected shall begin the term of office in January of 2011 at the same time as county judges generally, and there shall be no vacancy of the office before that time.  Thereafter, the judge shall otherwise be elected, and any vacancy in office filled, as provided for county judges generally. (4)  The Board of Supervisors of Pearl River County may, in its discretion, set aside, appropriate and expend monies from the general fund to be used in the payment of salaries of the judge, clerks, reporters, officers and employees of the youth court division of the county court, including the related facilities of the youth court division of the county court, and such funds shall be expended for no other purposes.  The county shall not be reimbursed for the amount of any such levy provided for by this section under the terms of the Homestead Exemption Law. SECTION 74.  Section 9-9-18.3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-9-18.3.  (1) In order to relieve the crowded condition of the docket in the county court and in the youth court of Lauderdale County and particularly to facilitate and make possible the trial and disposition of the large number of causes on the docket and in the youth court, there shall be two (2) county judges for Lauderdale County, provided for and elected as herein set out. (2)  For the purposes of nomination and election, the two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct, the presently existing judgeship and its succession to be denominated for purposes of appointment, nomination and election only as "Place One" and the judgeship hereby created and its succession for said selfsame purposes and none other to be designated as "Place Two."  There shall be no distinction whatsoever in the powers, duties and emoluments of the two (2) offices of county judge, except that the county judge of Lauderdale County who has been for the longest time continuously a county judge of the county shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets.  Should neither judge of the county court have served longer in office than the other, then that judge of the county court who has been for the longest time a member of The Mississippi Bar shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets. (3)  While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the said county judges other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws of this state, the county court of Lauderdale County may, in the discretion of the county judge who has been for the longest time continuously a judge of said court, be divided into civil, equity, criminal and youth court divisions as a matter of convenience by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court. (4)  The initial holder of the additional judgeship created by this section, or "Place Two," shall be elected in the regular election of November 2006; candidates therefor shall qualify to run not later than forty-five (45) days before that election.  The person elected shall begin the term of office in January of 2007 at the same time as county judges generally, and there shall be no vacancy of the office before that time.  Thereafter the two (2) judges shall otherwise be elected, and any vacancy in office filled, as provided for county judges generally. (5)  The Board of Supervisors of Lauderdale County may, in its discretion, set aside, appropriate and expend monies from the general fund to be used in the payment of salaries of judges, clerks, reporters, officers and employees of the youth court division of the county court, including the related facilities of the youth court division of the county court, and such funds shall be expended for no other purposes.  The county shall not be reimbursed for the amount of any such levy provided for by this section under the terms of the Homestead Exemption Law. SECTION 75.  Section 9-9-18.5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-9-18.5.  (1) In order to relieve the crowded condition of the docket in the county court and in the youth court of DeSoto County and particularly to facilitate and make possible the trial and disposition of the large number of causes on the docket and in the youth court, there shall be two (2) county judges for DeSoto County, provided for and elected as herein set out. (2)  For the purposes of nomination and election, the two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct, the first existing judgeship and its succession to be denominated for purposes of appointment, nomination and election only as "Place One" and the judgeship hereby created and its succession for said selfsame purposes and none other to be designated as "Place Two."  There shall be no distinction whatsoever in the powers, duties and emoluments of the two (2) offices of county judge, except that the county judge of DeSoto County who has been for the longest time continuously a county judge of the county shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets.  Should neither judge of the county court have served longer in office than the other, then that judge who has been for the longest time a member of The Mississippi Bar shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets. (3)  While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the county judges other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws of this state, the county court of DeSoto County may, in the discretion of the county judge who has been for the longest time continuously a judge of the court, be divided into civil, equity, criminal and youth court divisions as a matter of convenience by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court. (4)  The initial holder of the additional judgeship created by this section, or "Place Two," shall be elected in the regular election of November 2008; candidates therefor shall qualify to run not later than forty-five (45) days before that election.  The term of office of the person elected shall begin on the first day of January following the November election and shall end at the same time as for county judges generally.  The two (2) judges shall otherwise be elected, and any vacancy in office filled, as provided for county judges generally. (5)  The Board of Supervisors of DeSoto County may, in its discretion, set aside, appropriate and expend monies from the general fund to be used in the payment of salaries of judges, clerks, reporters, officers and employees of the youth court division of the county court, including the related facilities of the youth court division of the county court, and such funds shall be expended for no other purposes.  The county shall not be reimbursed for the amount of any such levy provided for by this section under the terms of the Homestead Exemption Law. SECTION 76.  Section 9-9-18.6, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-9-18.6.  (1)  In order to relieve the crowded condition of the docket in the county court and in the youth court of Lee County and particularly to facilitate and make possible the trial and disposition of the large number of causes in the youth court, there shall be two (2) county judges for Lee County, provided for and elected as herein set out. (2)  For the purposes of nomination and election, the two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct, with the county judgeship that existed on January 1, 2018, to be denominated for purposes of appointment, nomination and election only as "Place One" and the additional judgeship hereby created to be designated as "Place Two."  There shall be no distinction whatsoever in the powers, duties and emoluments of the two (2) offices of county judge, except that the county judge of Lee County who has been for the longest time continuously a county judge of the county shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets.  Should neither judge of the county court have served longer in office than the other, then that judge of the county court who has been for the longest time a member of The Mississippi Bar shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets. (3)  While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the county judges other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws of this state, the county court of Lee County may, in the discretion of the county judge who has been for the longest time continuously a judge of the court, be divided into civil, equity, criminal and youth court divisions as a matter of convenience by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court. (4)  The initial holder of the additional judgeship created by this section, or "Place Two," shall be elected in the regular election of November 2018.  The person elected shall begin the term of office in January 2019 at the same time as county judges generally, and there shall be no vacancy of the office before that time.  The two (2) judges shall otherwise be elected, and any vacancy in office filled, as provided for county judges generally. (5)  Each county judge shall appoint a court reporter in accordance with Section 9-13-61 for the purpose of doing the necessary stenographic work of the court. (6)  The Board of Supervisors of Lee County may, in its discretion, set aside, appropriate and expend monies from the general fund to be used in the payment of salaries of judges, clerks, reporters, officers and employees of the youth court division of the county court, including the related facilities of the youth court division of the county court, and such funds shall be expended for no other purposes.  The county shall not be reimbursed for the amount of any such levy provided for by this section under the terms of the Homestead Exemption Law. SECTION 77.  Section 9-9-36, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-9-36.  In any county in cases where an overcrowded docket justifies the same, any chancellor may assign to a county judge in that county only, for hearing and final disposition, any case, cause, hearing or motion, or any proceedings involved in the trial and final disposition thereof. All orders in the cause, trial or hearing may be signed as follows:  "_______________ County Judge and Acting Chancellor by assignment."  No special order evidencing the assignment shall be entered on the minutes. No compensation for those services shall be allowed the county judge, neither shall the county judge be compelled to accept any assignment except at his will.  Furthermore, no assignment of any cause or hearing shall be made where counsel on both sides object to the assignment. SECTION 78.  Section 9-9-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-9-21.  (1)  The jurisdiction of the county court shall be as follows:  It shall have jurisdiction concurrent with the justice court in all matters, civil and criminal of which the justice court has jurisdiction; and it shall have jurisdiction concurrent with the circuit and chancery courts in all matters of law and equity wherein the amount of value of the thing in controversy shall not exceed, exclusive of costs and interest, the sum of Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00), and the jurisdiction of the county court shall not be affected by any setoff, counterclaim or cross-bill in such actions where the amount sought to be recovered in such setoff, counterclaim or cross-bill exceeds Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00).  Provided, however, the party filing such setoff, counterclaim or cross-bill which exceeds Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) shall give notice to the opposite party or parties as provided in Section 13-3-83, and on motion of all parties filed within twenty (20) days after the filing of such setoff, counterclaim or cross-bill, the county court shall transfer the case to the circuit or chancery court wherein the county court is situated and which would otherwise have jurisdiction.  It shall have exclusively the jurisdiction heretofore exercised by the justice court in the following matters and causes:  namely, eminent domain, the partition of personal property, and actions of unlawful entry and detainer, provided that the actions of eminent domain and unlawful entry and detainer may be returnable and triable before the judge of said court in vacation.  The county court shall have jurisdiction over criminal matters in the county assigned by a judge of the circuit court district in which the county is included. (2)  In the event of the establishment of a county court by an agreement between two (2) or more counties as provided in Section 9-9-3, it shall be lawful for such court sitting in one (1) county to act upon any and all matters of which it has jurisdiction as provided by law arising in the other county under the jurisdiction of said court. SECTION 79.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.